It thought the same thing, searched hard when it seemed like it wasn't going anywhere and now I have four interviews in the next two weeks!  Keep on keepin' on broseph!
He has tons of counters in the laning phase:  - Vindicator - Demented Shaman - Pharaoh - Silhouette (but honestly, who does she not counter?) - Jeraziah - Tundra - Torturer - Succubus  etc.  Later it's just hard disables and good initiation, Hellflower is incredibly good at shutting him down, any true disabler too.
I know exactly how you feel man.  It's amazing how entry-level positions now require 2-3 years experience and a couple of internships aren't enough.
&gt;Then play soldier or scout.  Can't take on a heavy/medic.
Hmm...that's quite a catch of a man you have there. Well done...could you possibly name your house The USS Enterprise or would that be copyright infringement? =P
Ironically I get a lot of my 'major' Euro news from Al-Jazeera.  After that it's all local or regional.
&gt;That was because the DPRK forces were already exhausted and weren't well equipped anyway. They're much better off this time around.  Aren't you forgetting a small detail here: some 900,000 Chinese?  Without them, Korea would have been reunited in 1950.
Bahahahaha. XD  One of the best [Fixed]s I've seen.
The opinions I've expressed relate directly to how I perceive adulthood.   When I entered the thread I asked a question. The question being "Are all of you people children?"  The answer to this is clearly "No." Not every user is a child. I'm certainly not one. You sound increasingly like one, but I wouldn't say you are one.  The vast majority of the posters in this subreddit are clearly children. If you want to prove me wrong, you do the survey. The burden of proof is on you at this point, because to me, and every other adult redditor I've ever associated with who visits this subreddit, it's glaringly obvious that kids run the place.
I read a lot of words before I heard them pronounced and so I would often make a fucks pass with words like hyper bowl, or fake aid.   (faux pas, hyperbole, facade)
I know what you mean...but it's better than the opposite...if you wanted a sip and he wouldn't give you one.
A client of mine was told the same thing when his former web developer stole all his data and his domain name and attempted to emulate his business after first taking his money. When they told him it was a civil case I assumed that fraud and theft to the police are too complicated to understand. I attempted to file a fraud charge against someone with the police once and got the reaction that they didn't know what charge to file. "Fraud," I suggested. "We don't see that in the books."
But it's not technically legally availa... wait a tick... I'm on to you...
Thanks for that. 
&gt;There's not a lot that's more mellow than a charity ride  Can't say I agree. Everybody's a racer in their own mind, I've seen an insane amount of retarded shit at charity rides. Racing is safer.
Logical and perceptive comment; you should repost this where everybody could read it. 
I've got one too!! So excited!!
Just got there.  Congrats everyone.  A small step, but an important one.
Hell yes it was.   This is Michael Scott we're talking about. 
First off, I'm not a fan of the Duke Nukem games, nor am a big supporter of GameStop, but it's THIER right as a business to put up what they choose to in the store.  Even I know that the game uses humor and it's very tongue and cheek.  Yes Whiney Dad worry about woman never being able to live up to the girls in the game, no guy will ever live up to being Duke Nukem either.  In short I think he's a terrible father, all he's doing is perpetuating the growth that we're going to have a nation of whining simpering people that have no sense of humor and instead would rather blog about it then explain to their kids what satire is.  My dad was a Man's man.  He played guitar, worked on Harleys, slept with tons of women (after the divorce), apologized when he was wrong and knew when he should and shouldn't say things.  Not to mention he was only 5'8'" and was a tough SOB.  But, he could also explain "the ghost in the machine", treat people with respect, charm the pants off anyone, and teach my sister and I how to be good people.  In short, I hope when I have kids I'm nothing like this festering turd and that I raise my kids as well as my parents raised me.  I know I'll do the right thing because I've never felt insecure about a video game character.
&gt;The big guys were clearly trying to avoid trouble but the little guy just wouldn't let it go.  I disagree.  We don't have enough information to declare that with any certainty.  THEY chose violence first and he reacted stupidly but still.  I don't care how much of an idiot you are, saying something stupid does not justify being assaulted by people twice your size.
When I took shrooms I brewed up 250ish shrooms and then used the boiling water to make a coffee, went down a treat!:) It's a good way to avoid going through the experience of the rough taste that you get from shrooms.
s-so... many... Wendy's bags... O_O
A $24 gauss meter isn't something I would rely on.  And no, the level of EMF radiation is not labeled on devices, sadly.  As an engineer you should know about the inverse-square law.  So yes, transmission lines carry huge energy levels, but the EM radiation levels taper off very quickly as you add distance.  A cellphone has much less power, but you're putting it *directly* in contact with your head, in very close proximity to your brain.  I've been taking EM readings for years, with good meters.  I've taken readings under powerlines, cars, homes, cell phones, cordless phones, you name it.   I've done the readings and seen the numbers.  That's how I know you're wrong.
I think the confusing part was when you referred to Wednesday with a past tense.  
no, i would never
The video is exactly what I said it was Reid says the GOP is hurting the economy with their position on the Debt Ceiling.  Yes the video is from 2006.
lay down on their sides?  thought not...
It was really fucked up too.   So we're all standing upstairs, me and my roomie have guns in our faces while a third guy looks for other valuables, which we didn't have.  I had $10 or $15 cash on me.  So they start talking to me and not pay attention to my roomie for a moment, so he slips out into the dining room and hops out the 2nd story window. Once they realize he's gone they sort of panic.  One of them runs up, full on sprint and clocks me in the eye, knocking me down.   I sit there sort of stunned and few something wet running down my face.   The guy who appeared to be in charge comes over, asks what happened.  I tell him the other guy hit me.  He asks why, I say I don't know, he didn't say anything.   Then he, sincerely apologizes, gives me my $10 back and leaves.   So after it's done I'm sitting there alone, blood running down my face from a split eye brow and $10 in my lap thinking "what in the HELL just happened".
They sensor the connection coming into your dorm room?
I'm incredibly jealous.
At least there's no need to listen
So what exactly is it that makes someone a "viable candidate"? 
As an owner of one of the originals that were released through AA last year, I can vouch this game is really fun. For those that are not aware, [this](http://i.imgur.com/4hjWFh.jpg) is what the original looks like (that pic is my copy).
God. Damn. It.  I've been troll-blinded by my /r/new rage.
I do not understand what tilt shift is. Quick explanation anyone?
I miss this place.. Stupid USU dragging me away..
Cut into equal parts? but yeah. Shame there's no multi user support for Android yet.What I norm do is allow each person to have their own home screen to do as they please with short cuts and widgets.
So you didn't invest your earnings or use them to get educated? Just like a professional athlete or model I guess.
Lol, thanks!   Edit: I also think that was when I was jumping up and down about food. 
Eagles are actually remarkably common in MN/WI as well. Now, there won't be 11 on a single dock like that (unless you feed them), but you will always see one if you spend a day on the lake.  Also, if you don't notice the one sitting on the lowest branch of your tree and you walking under it causes it to take flight: it might as well be a dragon because for that split second when all you see is wings and darkness, you will be quite startled.
Is there a knife coming out of the carriage?
It's perfect like it is.  Sorry for your loss.
http://seattlebubble.com/blog/  Has much more information and tracks all the different price tiers.
Then I'd go for the SR60's. I find it pretty hard to be disappointed in those bad boys, especially for the cash.
I actually prefer subtitles. I almost never play with the sound on.
Well, my rate used to me like 14% which wasn't terrible for what was essentially a short term loan.  I used it to fill in the gaps when things came up that I needed to pay for and couldn't afford at the moment.  Obviously not ideal but people sometimes need or want to pay for things when they can't afford them.  I am mainly pissed off because BoA bought out my bank and doubled the rate so now paying it off is priority number one.  Sure I can only blame myself for being less than perfectly responsible but in the long run I take it as a lesson in prioritizing.  Now that I am in a situation that allows for more savings I will not need to use credit as often in the future. Right now my main issue is how much to save and how much to put toward paying off the balance.  In theory I would want to put every extra cent into paying off this high interest debt but at the same time I want at least some cushion in savings so that I am not tempted or forced to use credit for emergencies or just flexibility.
fuck scales, you are the same person before some number came up. you are more than numbers and statistics. put your head down, eat right, and you will be half the size in a year.
You need to stop thinking of what others think of you and realize everybody is pretty and if they don't like you you need to be like fuck you guys.  ps i love your hair color your tits are good to. very pretty.
Not a chance. I like my people (most of them).
I was delighted to see Proudhon there myself.  I really can't make head or tails of his presence at the meeting, I'd love to see a little more context. 
**WE DID IT 500,000 Just now**
Too much wasted water. Bad hippie!
Smoke meth for three more years and you could have 12 teeth!
I remember when I first saw this, I laughed so hard I cried.
&gt;And how can as much info as possible be bad?   Information overload. Point of diminishing returns.  Yadda yadda.
Tell that to the Japanese Jews. They exist.
You can just boot off the CD and reinstall it over itself and the installer will preserve your home directory unless you explicitly select format.
Met! :D People are still signing too
Well shit then...
This will kill one person - the bible has killed, literally, millions!   What was that about tragedies and statistics again?...  Actually, it wouldn't be like the bible - unless the 3-a-dayers were murdering the 4-and-then-3-a-dayers, and both were killing the 1-or-2-er's, who formed from a merger of the 11-a-day-er's and the 4-a-day-er's-modern-reformed!...
ಠ_ಠ  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i8z7NC5sgik 
or a squeaky baby...
It doesn't seem like the digital part is what is getting people worked up. I'm thinking about getting a tablet soon, and reading comics on it is a huge reason why. If they pushed this "same-day digital" thing without the reboot, everyone would be hunky-dory. 
I'm sure you're getting downvoted for the phrase "just another black kid in the ghetto". Pandering doesn't work on Reddit.  BTW, no downvote here.
No but thanks for assuming.   You still havent checked my sources till you actualy do i'm not even gonna bother.
Same here. My universities co-op program has proven invaluable. Got my job 6 months before graduation. 96% placement for our graduating class within 3 months of graduation. It is seriously the single-most important selling factor for my university.
Send one my way and I'll make a proper assessment. c:
What you need to remember is that this question can be posed for basically any group of objects. Reality is composed of infinite numbers of gray areas, where nearly everything only half-fits into the broad categories we build for them.  Do jellyfish exist? Only as much as hamburgers and cars exist.
A little light skepticism is pretty healthy, especially with regards to your own health. Reading WebMD and pretending you know more than your doctor is a waste, you are right.
i guess someone else went to check the source :D
Big footrace event in San Fran. Tons of people dress up in costumes. I saw that same lemmings group
I go out of my way.  For example, lemon juice from the big store is $1.99.  Lemon juice from the Korean mart next door is $2.99.  I pay the 50% premium with pride.
That's not what the case decided.
holy shi-
Or you could just smoke out on the patio like a respectful semi adult?
Well, the jerking off really relaxes me and puts my mind in the right place, I feel all zen and lift better
post on front porch forum
First Watch all the way.  No Sunday morning is complete without those little fried potatoes.
It's not just PCI slots though that you give up going with an mATX board. Often times you also lose memory slots (I see more mATX boards with 2x slots vs 4x) and you also lose SATA plugs. I'm sorry, for most systems 4x SATA plugs is really NOT enough and you'll regret having less slots down the road. In my current desktop which is an mATX I have three HDs and a DVD drive. All the hard drives are borderline full and its not cost effective to buy BIGGER drives vs scaling out but I cant without getting a SATA card which I cant cause...oh yea, my slots are full
Christina Ricca has a tight body and that's a fact!
What's wrong with learning something from an experienced woman?  I hazard that if she knows your age she's well aware that she likely knows more in the sack than you do.  That could be a turn-on for her.
Personally I kinda like knowing the ingredients that go into the food I buy.  Given that requirement, some things are only going to have one, obvious ingredient.
Spent 2 hours installing, started game up... Failed to load snowflake mesh whatever. Crash.   Why do I always try shit like this?
Sharp knees, etc.
Ah, so it'd be okay if the president said he talked to god through a fiery shrub.  EDIT:  Pareidolia seems to be popular with him too.  Especially on food.
yes, and also spread butt cheek pic, i can tell age from the anus like rings on a tree cut in half
No one disagrees that the USPS needs to be keep up with technological change.  But it is operating just fine. I got my mail today. I got it all last week. I got it all last month. I actually can't remember *ever* not getting it except on Sundays and holidays. The USPS delivers the mail quite well.
&lt;ranier_wolfcastle_standup.jpg&gt;
&gt;I don't know why because I usually just say "you're welcome"   I like to make sure people understand that the reason I did a good thing for them had nothing to with skydaddy. I give a hobo some change, he says "god bless you", I say "I don't believe in god" and walk away.
Yeah, i don't turn it off much either, and it's been acting pretty slow lately too.
wait, should we ignore your username for that one, too?  aaagh, brain hurt.
Hi(gh) Chief.  
I was addicted to prostitution, or I was a prostitute? I would think the story of overcoming the abuses of my pimp/girlfriend would make a much better story. 
That's pretty much how I switched careers, and now I actually have a legitimate resume that I'm willing to show people!
To me, obvious.  Elements of a patch that effect terrain generation far outweigh any crafted item convenience tweeks. And yeah, piggy-backing a totally unrelated and quite frankly trivial idea is earmark lame worthy.
I want more than anything in this world for you to be correct. That people wouldn't lie about something like this.  Let me be perfectly clear here. If I had something that could be transmitted via sex, I'd basically stop having sex with uninfected people.  Shit, I'd go as far as tattooing that over my junk just to be sure!
&gt;How do you know?   Probably has had a wide sampling, like me. I can confirm her results. You're in the minority if you legitimately know what you're doing and aren't protesting too much.
Heh, yup.  Still, my advice, don't hide the freckles.
Hobbit feet
I've learned the hard way never to expect childish people to act maturely when you inconvenience them...
What? Who is this guy? How come I haven't heard of him before?  WHO DO I HAVE TO KILL TO MAKE HIM KING???
'Why should your personal beliefs about the universe play any part in your job which is to govern this city? (It is a city right? Not American :p) Surely religion is as irrelevant to politics as what team you support or what music you like?'  Also more aggressive, assuming he is the kind of very religious politician who is pro-life, promotes creationism in class &amp; other such enforcement of religious beliefs:  'In a country which values individual freedom above all else, what gives you the right to enforce your personal religious beliefs, which are by no means held by all of the population, on the entire population. Is this not a violation of freedom?' (I'm sure you could throw in a reference to one of those fancy amendments you have here.)  This is always the first train of thought that comes to my mind &amp; is something I've always wanted to ask.  Apologies, if I've mistaken your mayor for a bible bashing mental case &amp; he is actually a nice guy.
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; That's the point of a reddit birthday. Didn't you get the memo four years ago?
Cat Bus!  トトロ
Bonus: You will never have to worry about another man hitting on her!!
&gt;Paul voted to ban partial-birth abortion, something the VAST majority of people are against.  Paul's view is that federal government has no place in abortion laws, by Paul's own opinion on the constitution and abortion, his vote here was unconstitutional. Making him a hypocrite no matter what you or others think of partial-birth abortion and proving to me that he will put his own personal opinion over what even he says is constitutional. Something he and his followers claim he would never do and something he often criticizes other politicians for doing.  He can affect all the things I mentioned. Just because you can't grasp that doesn't mean it isn't true. I will not support a person who would do the things Paul would like to do. His actions as a congressman and the shit he's tried to push through is bad enough in my opinion. I will not vote for him. You always look to a person's past actions and stances on various issues when deciding to vote. Paul shouldn't be any different. 
Face of Boe - Ultimate troll. Says last words in a language no one can understand. 
wow.... who in the world is this girl  http://imgur.com/r/nsfw/06twX
I don't mean to ruin the fun, but they do this quite a lot in japan. It's fairly common to see these in box lunches.
Because they are targeted, more controlled and more researched.
[First thought](http://edge.imgur.com/nFI3I.jpg)   anybody?
The famed National Geographic image of the Afghani woman is especially emotional because her very attractive eyes have narrowed irises.  While this usually is merely the result of looking into bright light, in her case it evokes the sense of fear. 
aaaaass youuuuu wiiiissssssshhhhhh
It already does this.  It caches before you go, and it caches all streets within a certain proximity to your route in case you need to reroute along the way.  Open Maps, press Menu &gt; More &gt; Cache settings.  Granted, the feature could be better.  We should be able to save a route, which is cached permanently on the phone, rather than on demand.  I think we need more options to be able to control cache size and distance around routes to cache data for.  In any case, it's already there and has been for about a year I believe, and I'm sure it will improve over time.
The tastiest strain i have ever tasted. 2nd place goes to Rokerij for their Northern Lights #5 x Haze.
I really don't understand your post, but I've been called antisemitic on multiple occasions for even mentioning the fact that people besides jews died in the holocaust.   you do seem quite hateful though.
##I'M A SHAAAARK, I'M A SHAAAAAAAARK. SUCK MY DIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIICK, I'M A SHAAAAAAAAAAARK
I kind of want one of those now. Only for non-sexual manly cuddling purposes of course.   *Stop looking at me like that.*
I prefer NoScript, an addon for firefox. 
Did anybody else see the tail as a long drooping scrotum?
Expected: cthulu Received: disappointment 
Is that **WOOHOO**, **FUCK**, **OH SHIT**, **BIATCH**, **THAT'S GAY** guy? I hate that shithead too. Why doesn't he know he's hated? Is he really into pep rallies?  How did he get into college? How come he doesn't realize that evening/night time is STUDY time? I blame the niggers and the gays. Mostly niggers (who seem to ALL be like this), but the gays too, since I'm not gay...no really.
What was his explanation for moving your stuff out?  He just figured, "his fridge stinks, so I'll put all of his things outside even though he's paying rent"?  I feel like we're not getting the whole story here....
Nice try, Vector Marketing!
http://www.anandtech.com/bench/Product/88?vs=289  Here's a decent comparison.  They are pretty close - the 2100 is slightly faster in single and double threaded apps, the 955 is faster in multi-threaded apps.  The question is are you gaming or video editing/compiling?  Side note:  I have a personal bias towards AMD, mainly due to the drm restrictions put into the sandy bridge stuff.  Those restrictions wouldn't effect me, I just think they are BS.
Get Obama out of the White House and you might have a chance!
Does anyone know if a leaked copy is available, I will buy it at release, however I am impatient, the music is fantastic.
Nice turn ups
Lets play videos are always boring.
Yeah, so when shuttles come back. Guess who gets to restart the human race. Goldman Sach. :P
Every internship I've applied for wants work experience...
i think you made the right choice sir.
"Stanley" is my cadaver for Anatomy Lab. I'm learning to be a veterinary technician, and he valiantly gave his life so that I may save the lives of others. (Actually was probably a shelter cat that got euthanized, skinned, and chemically preserved.)  We learn the major muscles, bones, joints, and organs by dissecting these cadavers over the course of five weeks.  The hope is that I will be able to save many, many lives by using the knowledge I gained from working with Stanley.
I agree. My argument was based on science and legal rights. When I brought up the statistics I was trying to show her it was a false claim to say the type of abortions I thought should be illegal never happened. I should have written my responses more clearly I, that is where I believe I messed up.  But, I was arguing for the scientifically decided "cut off" time for abortions based on legal rights.  Baby's have legal rights. This is reflected in child abuse laws and act's that give killers more time for killing a pregnant woman.  Based on that, I think there should be a scientifically proved time at which the fetus is considered a baby and abortions should be illegal based on that scientifically found time frame. We already give babies rights once they're born, yet part of the time before they're born they are already developed, feel pain and are considered a person if killed.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Murder_of_pregnant_women#Laws_and_policies
A blood disorder that affects the way my metabolism works. 
IdrA is one hilarious individual.
How about the best of both? * People near you hear your voice normally, with the volume dependent on distance. * Squadmates who are not near you hear you, but the game applies some [minor radio distortion](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Xu8nYa8Ylj0&amp;feature=related) to your voice.
you just broke it...  ಠ_ಠ
[Forever Alonso](https://fasinfrankvintage.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/09/fresh-prince-carlton-banks-400a111306.jpg)
You don't need the degrees, just the hours of science to sit for the patent bar. Your work experience would then be very helpful, espy, chemistry, microbilogy.
And then the movie rights were sold... http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0034587/
A photo of Mornington Crescent should be obligatory, unless there is a legitimately alternate photo, according to the rules; and excluding Baker Street, naturally.
My family has also bought 6 copies. My 4 year old just got an account today! He is damned excited. 
I did this, but I cheated to do it and told everyone that I didn't. It was much easier
The USPS receives no public funding so I dont see an issue.
College teachers are such liars. Never study and get straight A's or B's. Then again, I attend a Community College [](/troll "Doesn't count")
So, in essence, the difference is that the pterodactyl doesn't have 4000 years of tradition behind it?  That doesn't actually say anything about either concept.  From an external perspective the ideas are equally valid.
Haha, that's awesome! Thanks, man.  His headband reminds me of Ninja Turtles.
Also, I noticed that when you play a robber early, you get retaliated against by everybody, not just the person that you stole the card from.  However, when the next player gets to move the robber, there is only a 2/3 chance that the person who stole the card is in the best position (and therefore the logical person to put the robber on).  By attacking a person who is not in the best position, you are sabotaging your own chances of winning.
TNT wouldn't get rid of it either.  Maybe you shoulda through about that before doing Bedrock.
Partly because I've been playing Zerg since SC/BW and enjoy the different mechanics, but mostly because I want to be that rat bastard that chain fungals your entire worker line, melts your marine ball with burrowed banelings, and tech-switches so fast you won't know what hit you.
Soap dispenser... I mean really? 
Meh, it's a virtual monday. :(
Yeah we're at opposite ends of the spectrum haha. I don't want a playlist. I don't want to take the time. I want my random player to play through my 10GB of music, in random order without repeating songs I've skipped or already heard. I work with my hands all day; I can't be pulling my phone in and out of my pocket to skip a song that I've heard 4 times already, but that's what I have to do now.. 
My browser does not save cookies, so I regularly create new ids (see, I like privacy).  The answer is germany.  The german constitution draws heavily from the american one, with the difference that after the experience of genocide, there is a bit more emphasis on dignity than in the american version. Also, the international decralration of human rights follows the same pattern, as does the newer european declaration. The concept of individual human rights is very international.
Where did you order them from, I want a copy. This was my favorite tv show as a kid.
The so-called technological singularity, where humans will merge with their technology, and human advancement will accelerate at exponential levels.  Ray Kurzweil, in one of his books, predicts will will happen around the mid 21st century.  I'm not so optimistic; I think we'll be set back several decades due to worldwide economic disaster.
Coming from Westminster/HB, first reddit event, but I'm down.
Has anyone done extensive testing to see if the yellow-to-red flower ratio is 1:1 over a large sample size?  My small-sample-size test didn't seem to indicate 1:1.  18 bonemeal yielded   *  Seeds -- 32   *  Yellow flowers -- 23   *  Red flowers -- 5  EDIT:  Do bullet points not work?
"Cognitive therapy", so that's what they call re-education now.
that is a fantastic air mattress. would buy again. 
It isn't my rules. These are the definitions of the words.   &gt;I'm absolutely an agnostic, but not a theist or an atheist  If you're not a theist, then you're an atheist. That's what the word means: Not theist.  Agnosticism isn't a middle-position between theism and atheism.
I thought it was ridiculously simplistic.  I got really damn close on Oblivion though
Hey guys, this is the first installment of a new thing I want to do, where I'll be taking popular examples of slightly obscure or less heard of music genres and examining them more closely.  I want to start off with a genre that isn't so obscure, I thought the popular Yoruba influenced Afrobeat was a good place to start. Since it is not too unlike many popular genres in western culture. And, who better than the father of Afrobeat himself, Fela Kuti. Fela is a superb musician, who was very skilled on many different instruments. Though, he mainly composed most of his songs on keyboards and would routinely play sax at live shows.   Afrobeat is a complex genre that blends traditional Yoruba music with funk, jazz, and rock, as well as West African chanting rhythms. The music often blends many different melodies creating a polyrhythmic structure.  Fela's band in particular often used two saxophonists and two bassists to reach an extreme meshing of melodic rhythms.   The end result is a very creative expression of traditional African music combined with more modern music styles. It's definitely worth looking more into. Fela is obviously one of the key places to start, as well as his son Femi Kuti. Other notable performers and groups are Ade Bantu, Tony Allen, Sonny Okosun, Afrodizz, The Chicago Afrobeat Project, and Kokolo. Hope you enjoy exploring this great music genre.
Yes, it was.
Public figures, people in the news for one reason or another is ok. Its really no personal info withing reason. But you have to act like its zero tolerance that way people can't argue around it(as easily, people will always try to argue it.)  So saying "X celebrity or Public Figure did this" and saying things about them is ok, but you could even take that to far. Like posting Brad Pitts personal email or phone number on here isn't ok either.  What they are really trying to cut down on is "Hey my neighbor is a D-Bag for the following reasons...  Heres is personal info lets get after him.  John Doe  123 Maple Street, California, 12257  jogn@emailisawesome.com  (000)-123-9876"  That kind of stuff is what we are trying to cut down on.
Oh boy, you caught me. Maybe it was aught-six?  I made this account 6 months after arriving...hmm, so I guess that was 2006, my apologies.  Now, why are you talking down to me in a jerky manner? You sound like a detective on the trail of a killer.  You even check the internet archives to make some point about all this?  What gives Detective nml5566?  I thought that tidbit was something interesting to add to the discussion yet you act like your having a court case.  Try and be a little nicer.
I don't think anyone is typing in caps here, including the person to whom you replied. People don't like the pop-up notifications, but no one is being as dramatic as you're making it seem. If they are, they are in the minority. I follow /r/apple very closely and I see everything that's posted here throughout the day. People post negative comments about the iOS notification system, but only a small minority even come close to being very dramatic about it. One can say that they dislike iOS notifications, and they can even say that they hate them, without being classified as some kind of lunatic.  &gt;"Solution: turn off wifi when not using it?"  That's not a proper solution. "Don't use it" is never a proper solution. A more elegant solution can be created, as can be seen on Android. Further, he was only talking about one thing: WiFi. There are many apps that pop messages. Should we turn them ALL off if we don't want to be disturbed while working on something or playing a game, and then turn them all back on again when we are ready to see notifications? That's not elegant at all.
the 2 other bodies seem a better option for those just-in-case moments rather than hauling the extra film.  I'm SO happy I don't have to travel with all the different films/polaroid anymore.  although I do miss polaroid.  
I have a question for you out of the blue.  I want to start a website to gain experience in web development, as the only websites I've ever made were when I was 10 or 11 and their sole purpose was to gush over how much I loved Rareware games. (*so* glad those are now gone) So anyway, I'm unemployed (hence me spending many hours per day learning programming to try to get a job) and can't afford to pay anything at all.  Where can I host a site for free, but still upload/sync files directly via FTP (so as to gain experience in automating this process through scripts, another skill I'm working on) and generally be allowed to make a decent site from scratch using whatever language(s) I want instead of being forced to use some crappy template?
Turns out this guy is a pro. [Here's a total n00b using one](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v46XohmbTpY&amp;feature=related).
spaniels are awesome dogs! my fav breed type by far. 
1 Bill's hat / 5 keys.
You need to see a doctor.
Yeah, it is like they demand every pen throughout the world to be writing about Jesus during his lifetime.  The Gospels make it a point to say Jesus was trying to avoid fame....
Which boarding school if you dont mind me asking.
I understand that viewpoint. Thank you for explaining. :)
I'm laughing at the fact that I learned krispykrackers' first name from the blog post.
* The IT Crowd * Garth Marenghi's Darkplace * Man Stroke Woman * Look Around You * Black Books
If someone violated my personal well being then I'd attack, with violence, in order to eliminate the threat. 
OUCH!   fuckin splinters
Enemy rage when you hit them with an Ashe arrow from your fountain. 
Why would the dealership qualify for the credit and not the end customer?
Holy crap!  I just topped out at 292, and it's time to get busy.  I thought I'd only ever be able to shave off a few pounds here and there but never really let myself think that a complete transformation would really be possible.  You, sir, have proven otherwise.  With a sensible plan no less (i.e., nothing crazy like Atkins or amputation). Well done.  
Maybe OJ?  Does he have internet in the NV prison?
Relevant: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qdh70xdZHK0
500,000 has been hit!
Volunteer somewhere. Internship. Or just fake it.  &gt;&gt;"Whenever you are asked if you can do a job, tell 'em, 'Certainly I can!' Then get busy and find out how to do it." - Teddy Roosevelt  &gt;-Michael Scott
Yeah I don't think anyone can eat 10 apples in 1 day even, but 2 watermelons is possible I think.
"*We're huge in Europe, our big record just broke in Belgium.*"
Gregas op wtf you talkin bout seamoosi.
[Dilated Peoples - Search 4 Bobby Fischer](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=J8hE8CV5rWg)
Well, now that I know what the hell you're talking about, I must agree!
Voldemort being the best at Legilimency doesn't mean that Snape can't be a better Occlumens.  Snape has to have been better because he's protected his true loyalties from Voldemort and became part of the inner circle.
I love being evil in games. Laughed my ass off when I committed an act of genocide in the first Mass Effect. Blew up Megaton without a moment of hesitation in Fallout 3. Let everyone stay dead just to get a million bucks in Fable 2. Hilarious.
On a more serious note [Nortt - Graven](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FbFzcR2CICA)
I eat at restaurants based on whether or not I like the food, the price, the service and atmosphere, regardless of it being a mom n pop place or national chain.
who here wants to be a Fire Truck!?
Depends on your situation.  For all I know, you could be in the wrong and trying to get IBM to cover accidental damage their warranty doesn't cover.  Without details I can't really give you any insight.
it looks like a rip off.
Congratulations on the success of your thread, and I cannot offer sufficient respect to your father for respecting your coming out.  I meant to comment on your original posting, but refrained, since it seemed to have taken off well before I got there.  I will only say this: the fact that you played in college, and that it wasn't until college that someone suggested you might have potential for the minor leagues tells me that you'd have more chance playing the lottery than making the majors. This has nothing to do with whom you fancy.  Potential big league players are such at the age of 17 or 18. They will not make the show until six or seven years later, if ever. College is too late.   On the one hand, the disgrace with which your teammates treated you is a shame; on the other, every player on every team ever has been mocked for the reason which is  most easy. If you had been a hetero with red hair, you would have been mocked for that (although perhaps not as ruthlessly).  Do what you love, and love what you do. There are precious few ballplayers who have a math background to fall back upon. And it's a damn shame that you were given grief because you bravely insisted on forcing people to respect your sexuality.  But here's where you're going to get angry with me: Nobody really cares who you sleep with. Nobody really cares about what happens off the field (provided it doesn't hurt your performance). At least until you throw it in their faces.  Personally I don't give a damn, but I recognize that there is an unofficial ban on open gays in sports. My opinion is that a sportsman need not say a damn thing about who he or she goes home with.  But unless you're Jackie fucking Robinson, you probably don't want to take the fight on by yourself.   In any sense, don't worry. You weren't going to make the show anyway (right now there's a player that plays bigger, is stronger, faster, hits better, steals better, throws better, and is hungrier than you'll ever be).  So fuck baseball, and fuck the minors. Instead, and quite literally, fuck whom you want to fuck ... 
"What hump?"
She's at the London Film and Comic Con.
My cat does this too but not before pushing all my clothes onto the floor. 
if it were a situation that wasnt related to child abuse and him not having proper parents, it would make sense that he could change. but the things we learn as a child are so deeply rooted in us that some people never change.  I know you would feel horrible for leaving him, but you cant be selfless about this because later on you'll just resent it. if youve already explained what you need and how you cant go without it, id find some school counsellor or therapist. but if that doesnt work, because it might, you might need to look for someone who can fulfill your needs.
Is school worth your damn time?
Wut?
I actually agree when it comes to harming insects or other living things, but I also find myself eating meat and living a mostly regular life.  
I bet the ratio is, at best 5:1. Generally around 10:1 though :P
No, it doesn't if used responsibly. 
That was on 3 separate occasions (WWE, Deep Purple and Bill Murray) I guess I'll have to dig out that picture now...  
I'm picturing some kind of over-marketed consumer good, along the lines of ridiculous Gatorade advertising. Like..."Only the coolest kids eat EvolutionO's cereal!  It's EXXXXTREEEEEEME!  The #1 choice of genetically competetive children!"
valid points, thank you :) I legitimately did want to know about the logistics of it all, so thank you for taking the time to respond.
I'm kind of a n00blet when it comes to CS, why does CS:S receive so much hate?
Yea, I'm not ok with this either. When I went to college in Texas, I was the "city boy" in the dorms. My Texas born friends not only smoked while filling up with gas, they would taunt me by putting the cigarette close to the nozzle just to watch me run. It worked. 
Get a haircut while you're at it.
and are an asshole.
jesus fucking christ.  I need to get into the supplement business.
&gt;There's a logical reason why we don't inflict suffering on each other by social contract, and it has nothing to do with morality  Really? Protections for children, the elderly, and the mentally ill are just "social contracts," and have no moral basis? What about sexual consent laws? Those don't have any moral basis either - they're purely practical and contractual (e.g. you don't rape me I don't rape you)? Is that how you think our society operates?  Our society is grounded in morals. Without morals, we are laboring single-person corporations who abide by regulation alone. Considering that most people *don't even know the local laws governing their own hometown* I'd very much disagree that we do not harm others merely because of a social contract not to.  We have morals; we're rationale, empathetic, and sensitive. That's what makes us human - that's what it means to be humane. Without that, we are not animals - we're monsters.
Where are you in Canada? The fish and chips here on the east coast is right some good. I love fresh haddock with a thin crispy batter, and hand cut fries. I also love clams and chips - whole fresh clams and not the strip crap - that is right some gooder.
I know that it does (http://youtu.be/B8ofWFx525s), but I can't be sure unless someone tells me, because of the filter bubble! :S
Same thing happened to me this week. At first i thought i was hallucinating but when i checked my sc2gears (autosave replays) the game was there but not in my history
Its the same as my phone's bluetooth name  Remote Detonator
I'll be back on like the end of the week (out of town right now) but I could always use some assistance lol. I'm currently in Gold. Case.794
&gt;Why not frame this from the taxpayer's perspective?  Because those dealers are also tax payers, and because the "screwing" happens at the point of collection, not the point of expenditure of tax dollars. 
Credit goes to artistgamergal for putting this on youtube.  This is all 90% true with navi!
No, fraud is fraud and fraud is criminal.  This probably violates the wording of the incentive at worst and the spirit of it at best. The question is will the regulatory body come down with an iron fist on the fraudsters.
Ya, that sucks.  I'm not sure why they've allowed it on the Samsung Infuse, but not their other phones.
We're terribly afraid of a Michelle Bachmann *Presidency,* but her candidacy should be fuel for a generation's worth of comedy.
Afraid of posting anonymously... I don't get you people [](/son)
Fun fact: They're not actually superheated, but the same temperature as the rest of the pants. They just have higher thermal diffusivity, meaning they transfer the heat onto your skin faster. The more you know.  inb4 someone proves me wrong.
I think you should use their formal name: PWWMSDADNPF or the "People Who Want Millions to Starve to Death in Africa During the Next Potato Famine."  *Yes, I know Africa isn't big potato country but who do you think is going to get the short end of the stick when food prices shoot up during a food disease epidemic? Yep, got it in one.
Slartibartfast
That would be awesome, I would watch it.
When I was around your age, my mother opened up a joint account with me.  My mother had to sign off on anything major like investments or account changes, but I was free to make deposits/withdrawals and use my debit card.  We were lucky enough to get an account that was service charge free as long as I kept a minimum balance of $1000 in the account at all times.  I don't know if an account with the $1000 min balance feature is still available these days but I'm sure something similar is around maybe with a different value.
Sorry your latkes got dissed :-(
Yes, every farmer is a dickbag that will cheat to get his job done.
Most likely due to their own stupidity and aggressiveness.
I would however need a scanning alt though, correct?
Kinder Eggs are fucking incredible!
This is what The Happening could have been.
He could be in  situation like class or a movie...
You're going to regret this one. [NSFL](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9wcte/reddit_whats_the_grossestnastiest_thing_thats/c0er6q4). Enjoy.
I said some it seems like **some** are **beginning** to live up top that douchey stereotype. That is not calling anyone a douche. I am simply asking why this behavior occurs here more than in most other reddits.
change your refresh rate 
I remember sitting in a Sunday School classroom. Our small group "teachers" were two older women. I remember them telling us all about these bible stories and all of a sudden I found myself just sitting there thinking "wait, they don't ACTUALLY believe this shit, do they? They're grown women." I wasn't even very old at this time when I realized what was happening. I couldn't believe these people. It almost seemed like a joke was being played on me. I lost intrest in the whole church thing after that and even quit caring about how many gold star stickers I got to put under my name for attendance. 
Gotta love these brainwashed useless hosts that always ask him "but you have no chance of winning, what's the point?"  I guarantee he wouldn't have asked that question to any of the other republicans at the last debate.  Fucking DICK!
I have the Inspire. I really like the screen - plenty of room and a decent resolution. Not too heavy but enough to give a good feel. Feels constructed well enough I've decided to go without a case. The camera is a good resolution, but pictures taken with the LED have a yellow-green tint.  18 hours might be a stretch on the battery, until you get into custom ROMs and underclock the CPU when it's idle. The battery door is notoriously hard to get into and you'll have a major problem if you break it - the phone doesn't power on without the door. The camera protrudes from the rear, so it's a scratch hazard, plus it won't sit stable on a flat surface.  Overall it's a good phone, but they could have done some things better.
Oh thanks for the spoiler alert.  Now you've ruined it for me.
How does `x +:= 1` represent anything meaningful?  If `:=` is the "first assignment" operator, `x +:= 1` (shorthand for `x := x + 1`) would define a variable that already exists by referencing the same variable. The semantics would be confusing if the left-hand `x` referred to a different variable than the implied right-hand `x`.  The only meaningful solution is to namespace the variables, but there's no point in doing so explicitly if you could already just rename the variables into something completely different to avoid the problem (or use `nonlocal` to mess with non-local variables).
Those pizzas probably cost less to make than the profit alone from your soda.
Last Whisper has more AD and ArPen than brutalizer :P that's the only reason I was asking for the numbers on it.
catch 22 sir. this is why you lie on your resume
You didn't sound like an asshole to me. The only person who sounds like an asshole is the OP.
Herobrine, like the Zax said, was never in the game but is a kind of dumb rumour that was started. Something about Herobrine being Notch's dead brother or something and showing up in people's games off into the distance and then running away.  I don't know the exact details, but it's kinda dumb.
put [] in front of it.
Kael?
Always loved this movie. I can't wait to sit down and watch it in Blu-Ray glory. I have high hopes.
FAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAKE  Also even if it had been real, big fucking deal. No one was even noticed.
That's what the word "genitals" is for. Think about if "penis" referred to my scrotum, testes, and penis as one package. I think people would think that ridiculous and ignorant, because nobody would make that mistake. That's a bit of a double standard.  Language is interesting in that if enough people use a term incorrectly, it becomes correct. So one day, things might change.  The issue I have with this is that I watch a video of a former Miss USA woman being groped by the TSA. She says that they touched her vagina. So then I think, "Wait, they fingered you to inspect for drugs?" Miss USA is a role model for girls and is making an allegation. It perpetuates the error for younger people and causes confusion for anyone taking her words seriously.  It's similar to think of me saying someone touched my penis, then they point to my penis, and I say, "No, what's wrong with you, I'm talking about here," and then I point to my scrotum. Why is it more acceptable to make that mistake with a female than with a male.
If you're planning it ahead it kind of isn't whimsical!
Time for new friends.  Sounds like they have something against you.   Like they all sat around and had a meeting to talk about how much they don't like you.
I use glass eyes online too and they are realy awesome and cost effective for me.  Not only that, but their customer service is awesome and their eyes are surprisingly durable (my cat nearly chewed the bag open, but the plastic safety eyes I had in there were unscathed).
"My dad Rapes me"
the inverted fork has the added benefit of reduced unsprung weight i.e. weight that is not on the spring.  more undamped mass means you have to run a higher spring or rebound rate than is "ideal".  basically if wheels were massless the bikes would ride much smoother because the wheels inertia over bumps would not come into play with suspension.  getting rid of the crown and just having the stanchions and wheel as unsprung rate should allow a rider to decend faster by having a better front suspension.
Sorry, I disagree. I don't think men are the ones who get the better ends of things. There are plenty of areas where men get the shit end of things. Why are there more homeless men than women? More boys dropping out of school, and less guys going to college? WAY more men in jail? More men killing themselves? The law clearly favours women, and basically every career involving children has become off limits to men.   If our society was so spectacular for men, this shit wouldn't be going on.  Yeah, there are a tiny number of elite men who have more power than women. The VAST majority of men don't. Then when we have feminists going "Hey, don't look at us, that's your own fault! It's because we live in a man loving patriarchy... OUR hands are clean and WE'RE the eternal victims here!", it's not exactly helping.  
Better than a waffle
I didn't say I liked it. 
Arrested Development Better off Ted Bob's Burgers (definitely recommend this.) IT Crowd Modern Family Community
That was a mistake. I popped over to find that link, found it, posted it, then thought I'd just follow a few links.  Having followed a few links at TVTropes, I have come back to reddit to find that that I left it one day ago. I need to sleep, I need a shower, I need to see the sun, I need to walk, I need to say hello to a human being.   It was a good 24 hours looking at TVTropes--they always are--but I won't be getting it back.
Its not the word that counts, its the sentiment behind it. Don't get hung up on labels, look behind them to what the person really means. If they genuinely mean to cause hurt, then by all means let them know. But if they are just being thoughtless, or telling a bad joke or some such, then just let it slide.
This one time... at space camp...
Blue tax and general insurance ads - UGH.
Submitted a different one for someone who has killed in self defense. That should be easier as killing in self-defense holds much less legal trouble than murder.
Its one thing to allude to possible betrayal  its another thing to smack the viewer of the head with it every chance you get until you get the feeling that its so obvious that perhaps he won't betray you since its so obvious  Then theres SC2, where we come full circle in that it alluded to the betrayal, kept smacking the viewer over the head with the allusions to the point that maybe, JUST MAYBE he won't betray us and it was all a big mixup...And then SC2 kept going with the foreboding until it was obvious that he was going to betray us.  Tychus's whole character was "This guy is going to betray you." and there was very little else to him. They could have alluded to Tychus having to come to grips with betraying raynor, they could of alluded to Tychus attempting to work his way out of the betrayal, perhaps soften Raynor up more in advance, work out a con to escape mengskt, ANYTHING. But no, instead Tychus sole reason to exist, and sole aspect to his character was to betray raynor.  Thats the kind of stuff that is simply bad writing.
Yes, this is the video in which Bear attempts to sleep in an actual dead camel. [Here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BpTJvMPfwhk) is the video where he skins a deer and sleeps in the hide.
I own that shirt.  I'm now going to burn it.
Should have been a shark
Don't any of you people have a job?
pedo bear gets laid crazy style
im not a woman but if i was i think my answer would be "covered in blood carrying the limb of an unknown person, perhaps missing bits of flesh on his upper torso.  wait. what?
♫*Good-bye hooorseees*♫
Dudes eat meat. Females tend to eat more veg. Mystery solved.
tl;dr: i tell bf this is my first reddit post, bf responds to said post and one ups me. :3
We didn't tell anyone.  It was the **best** decision.  Everyone's parents have had their chance to name children.  You're in charge of this new little one.  Lot's of people's feelings are going to get disregarded in the coming months.  It's hard enough to name a little being without a committee's feelings on the matter.
 WHOOOSH
worldedit. You have to make a selection around the bedrock and type:   //replace bedrock stone   Then bedrock becomes smooth stone.
I just. I don't. I can't even. Wow. Just, wow.
exorcist [](/wtf)
Flintstones, meet the Flintstones....
Was there anything you did especially that might have been important in not dying? Like a feature on the car or a last second maneuver that I can do so I don't die like that?
Exactly haha I can't handle when he looses it and Carla tugs his ear.
TIL what an Agnostic Atheist is, and that I think I am one. 
Worth mentioning that this comic comes from [one of the most underrated webcomics ever.](http://lastplacecomics.com/)
That particular gif has just become increasingly popular recently.
Her eyes seem a bit over brightened. I know that is passable in glamor shots and the like, but her's just glow a bit too much for my taste.
I wish I had more that one upvote to give. Congrats on perseverance paying off. We need more stories like this!
I have a friend thats an expert on bugs, let me call him up and see what we can do
Indigo Prophecy is available for PC, too.
You can't get experience if you can't get a job. Hence the Catch-22 here. Some places are even too full to take on volunteers.
I think that's probably the only thing Karma represents. A reposted picture of a cat might not be insightful or useful but if it gets 1k upvotes, that means a lot of people probably clicked on it and Conde is laughing all the way to the bank. 
/b/ doesn't care about this shit either. Maybe if you killed her you could post on r/picsofdeadkids
I don't know your style, but if you don't want your gloves to look like those of a futuristic cyborg or a power ranger, I'm a fan of [Olympia Full Throttle gloves](http://www.google.com/search?q=Olympia+450+Full+Throttle+Gloves). Has knuckle guards and a gel pad. But they aren't as advanced as true racing gloves.
haha for sure! But I love eating them after using them for awhile so they are nice and cold and kinda firm.. mmmmmm want to burn and have one right now!
first aid kit
All those people are laughing at it but half of them are going to go home and take turns in a bondage swing.
1. NPC affected spawn rates remains active for 3 * screen width x 3 * screen height. Furthermore, having 1 NPC in your house will reduce the maximum number of mobs down to 2 while halving the spawn rate. Having 2 NPCs will allow only one monster to spawn at a time while decreasing the spawn rate three-folds. Having 3 or more NPCs will cause mobs to cease spawning.  2. Each player has a safe box in which monsters cannot spawn and a spawn range. The spawn range sits at 1.2 * screen width and height (in each direction from the player) while the safe box has 0.55 the screen width and height in each direction. Furthermore, if a monster is over 2 screens away from the player, it is no longer considered active and new mobs may be spawned that replaces the inactive ones.  3. All mobs require at least 4x4 tiles of unobstructed and dirt/no walled space to spawn. This means that if you make tunnels only 3 tiles high, no mobs can spawn.
Oh, you mean National Insurance? Only if you're in full time employment.
And reading reddit on a 3.7" screen all day is surely going to lead to my blindness.   Answer to your question: I don't know, come back later. I'm too busy looking at porn on the cancer machine.
Ah, Danger Woman. She was at a charity 5K my church held.
Isn't this whole God fad over yet? :(
Not feminist theory, neuroscience.
Agreed. Hearts in Atlantis, Everything's Eventual (the story in the book of the same name), and Insomnia are all important. The Stand, of course. 
It was meant as a compliment, FYI.
VB script :p
And the rest of you!
*Picks fight over the correct color for the curtains*
And you probably wouldn't have had so much debt if you hadn't purchased a giant cat....Those things are expensive, not to mention the amount of food they eat.
[More info about their history...](http://fyca.sbmyc.com/Publications/CruisingGuide/cruisingp5.htm)
Nope. 
Yeah yeah I do believe it- "can't believe" was meant as just a saying, hehe
Although not nearly as dangerous as yours, I was attacked by a drunk person. I was 16 at the time, never fought before, so I simply stood there, scared shitless. He didn't beat the shit out of me, just hit me in the face. After that, I got into MMA and boxing, so I took BJJ. I now know how to defend myself. Good things came out of that experience :D.
He just doesn't want you to give up.
Walker Brothers compilation. Odd contrast.
No no, you have the information then preform "idea research." Find out what is true, what isn't, what is implied, and what is fact. You can pick up these ideas for people who think a certain way then look into it from the source. Such as the bill that has just been signed and the reviews from his collages. I can't really trust any news source when they seem extreme and i am not implying that you should.   Edit: better yet, read the bill yourself. http://www.mainelegislature.org/legis/bills/bills_125th/billtexts/HP098701.asp  Turns out the crazy communists have an idea or two in their head! MY favorite is how businesses can exploit ADULT secondary students under 20 years of age at $5.25 per hour for their first 180 days of employment. (AND THEN FIRE THEM)
I try and keep it local as much as I can: I go to the local hardware store rather than Home Depot, the local grocery chain rather than Safeway. I also try and use services from local, family run business for things like plumbing, yardwork, moving, etc.   Another great way to support local business is to buy things from Etsy from artisans in your area. I do this whenever I'm shopping for a gift.
then again Eminem produced it so he had Home Court Advantage
Sure. My library would be playing at random, without repeats. That's still random ORDER.
Go to a graduation party! Even if it's "not your thing" or you aren't really friends with anyone, go anyways! Someone from my school threw a party; over 300 people showed up (over half the grade), even the kids who were quiet or didn't party. It was awesome to be able to have a last party with everyone. 
It's a good thing that we have global laws now, and jurisdiction no longer matters.
[There is no amount of upvotes to compensate for how awesome ThiZ is! Thank you so much!](http://imgur.com/Gxcu7)
FW: FW: FW: RE: LOL DEMOCRATS FW: FW: FROM GRANDMA
I'd hit it. 
If the guy was attractive I would laugh and say no. If the guy was unattractive I would pokerface and say hell no.
While I agree that the Holocaust shouldn't only be known for its Jewish victims, this is pretty much discrimination in the same vane.  Where's the memorial for the Gypsies?  The mentally and physically deficient?  How about they just build "Holocaust Victim" memorials and skip the specific group mention.
Oops, always making assumptions :P
Once there was a spider on my back.
I wouldn't worry about it, you were doing it with your co-workers friends, so they should be used to people like that.  I mean they she lives with them, so she obviously cool with her.
&gt;The picture backgrounds are a good start, but when the browser is large, they repeat badly. You can use javascript to resize the background image, so that it's always full width - just google "resize background image javascript" and you'll get some good starts on how to do this.  For the background image, there is a nice way to do it in [CSS](http://css-tricks.com/perfect-full-page-background-image/)
Just got them in the mail today.  Thanks for being an awesome pony. *returns the brohoof from the index card*
[Capsized](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bY5NYrgmv1o&amp;feature=related)  10 dollars on Steam.
They get paid for follow up appointments to dicuss the results.
The prime minister has approved the building of a hydroelectric power plant and related infrastructure displacing a large group of people who seemed to live quite happily on the outskirts of a totally modernised society.  The picture seemed to sum up what I suppose the chief of the people being displaced thought, seperating from the industrialised society - I know this is lame, but I remembered the picture and it just jumped into my head earlier on.
It's funny 'cause it's true.
Have you been to any of the PDX r/doctorwho meetups yet?
It's only a problem when they're being idiots. 
I mix a heaping with a little bit of OJ and 8 oz of water. Follow up with as much water as possible (without having to get up and pee throughout the night). In the morning you'll I leave the bathroom feeling 10 pounds less.)
Thats the thing- they aren't really paid upgrades.  Think of it this way. If you have the 2010 model of a car and buy the 2012 model, then that's an upgrade; however, if you simply pay to get a new layer of paint on your car, then that isn't really an upgrade. There is a very distinct difference between the two situations. The second never impacts your cars performance. Blizzard offers us the second service, but does not offer the first, and has constantly assured that it will NEVER offer the first.
Be interesting to see what the price difference is, tho as I re-read your original post a large portion of the cost you are incurring is from the ground mounts.  That may be a catch-22 situation.  More expensive panels = less install cost with everything that goes along with that.  One thing to consider is it may be better to maximize your ROI versus maximizing net output.  By that I mean find out from them what a roof mount system would cost and what it would produce.  it will likely be a smaller system but if the cost per watt installed is say $2 less it may be a much quicker repay time frame. If they can talk you into a more expensive system to 'maximize production per panel' which nets them 15k more in install costs they'd do it in a heart beat. Also those early morning hours are not too productive.  My 3.2 kw system peaks at about 2600 watts at the middle of the day.  In the early morning it may be at 400-600 watts until the sun is much more overhead.  * edit - check out 1bog.org  I used them to get my system.  If they are in your area, it would be another data point on price.  Was satisfied overall with the process.
Well, sort of, I'm sure they use a lot of computers to edit, and layer, and they even use a lot of cell shaded 3D animation as well.  I know this just by watching its obvious.  But they do have a real orchestra doing the score!
Wow! I totally forgot about this. That was phenomenal back in the day. 
she has a little pinchy babyface
Tell me about it. I have been playing for over a year!
No, He is a performance artist, nail him to the wall and call him art!
As someone that can't get enough, those are old. :( 
One of [my favorite wineries](http://www.roesslercellars.com/Tasting-Room) is in Anderson Valley, as is one of [my favorite breweries](http://www.avbc.com/).
Pokemon didn't invent math though...  OR DID THEY!? *DUN DUN DUUUUUN*
this guy rocks! what an awesome singer. 
What?
Congrats.  My record was 2 years 3 months, and 5 days after 401 applications, which resulted in 60 interviews, 6 callbacks, and finally, 1 job I held for the next 3 years.  This was during the Bush Sr. recession from 1991-1993.  While I waited, I was a house husband, took care of my son during the day, did odd jobs for cash, wrote a book and several short stories, learned UNIX, was a member of a comedy group (main writer, terrible bit part actor), gained 50 pounds, and watched a lot of cable.
You are correct sir, I believe it mainly has to do with less aggressive prefetching along with some other optimizations. Windows Vista loves to grab hold of RAM and not let it go or no let it go quickly enough when applications need it...  
Harry Potter goes full blown muggle?!?   No, but really, I heard excellent reviews about this as well. I'm rather impressed with the lad for going to Broadway and absolutely nailing it. Good for him.
Great. Fucking. Game.
3 Sagan Moon. Someone... please.
I never got the feeling Olivia played video games. She seemed to diss on gamers a lot, I felt.
Really? I'm laughing my ass off.
Short answer - yes Long answer -I'm potentially interested.  I wonder what would be in the super smash brothers one.  It seems that a game like that wouldn't really need a guide, same with mario party 2.  Still interesting. I got 2 guides for Perfect Dark that the seller was including in a Perfect Dark CIB.   I also got a Banjo Kazooie one, I don't have the game yet but from what I've heard it seems like a game that would require/very much help if I had a guide, especially if I am going to 100% the game.
Yeah, I doubt the passage "He was the Christ" is genuine especially considering how Jewish Josephus remained.  
The cat-bus is okay, but I've found it doesn't have as good acceleration or cruising speed as the cat-coupe.
&gt;Reddit; where the grammar police paTROLL.  FTFY
But not that Paul  Ryan. It was some other lesser known Paul Ryan
Thanks for leaving his username!  You're a god amongst men
&gt;In 2010, a year when there were more than 15,000 drug-related killings  Ches gringos, me dan risa y miedo a la vez. Inventaron la bomba atómica, la detonaron en Nagasaki e Hiroshima cuando Japón estaba más que vencido. Mataron cientos de miles de vietnamitas en la guerra de Vietnam de las formas más crueles (agente naranja), Guerra de Corea (no tengo el dato), y más recientemente las guerras de Iraq y Afghanistan donde han muerto alrededor de 15,000 soldados y cientos de miles de civiles! Y les escandaliza que en México haya violencia de narcos financiada con su dinero y sus armas!!   Que pinche risa!
You calling me a liar, son? What do you want? My photo in front of a VTA train? My work ID? A photo of me in front of a go sharks sign that's still up around the beer stores? Or in front of a VTA car with Buster Posey and Aubrey huff on it? What? I'm in fucking San Jose right now, asshole.
Ah.
You are at an [8] at the most. 
A Jedi riding a narwal flying away from an exploding space station. 
Volunteer with your time. Shows you are trying.
It's not really about the karma, it just gets all irrational in the depression stage.   For me, it's more like watching the Jets vs The Sharks; it's hilarious to observe the madness of it all from the outside, but deep down you really want to be one of those cool cats snapping your fingers in a gang.
Since he's shockingly absent; I gotta show some love for my man [Magua](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/_PB-O1yT5EYg/TQgiKF2l0fI/AAAAAAABKI0/2x5P3pUQiT8/s1600/bama_1992_wesstudi_magua.jpg).
Exactly, I work as an intern and I don't mind being at the bottom of the pile, I have the least job experience, I have a lot to learn, everyone has to do it somewhere, I'm doing it here and now. Nobody is born spectacular at something, everyone has to work hard to be successful, if having to learn from other people is an ego blow you have an ego problem. 
I would give my left nut for 2%. Just graduated dental school and federal loans are at 6.8%.
you forgot the part where you learn your own stills at home so you can get a job
Lol...typing too fast, sorry..."Anyone who can only think of one way to spell a word obviously lacks imagination." - Mark Twain  Actually "The Lady of Shalott" is on the list.
This. It sounds like your relationship as friends could withstand you being honest about your feelings for her if you guys were able to go back to being friends after hooking up for a couple of months. Its worth a shot, even if she turns you down.
It sounds like you want to reinvent message queues (`man mq_overview`).
I prefer [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=T9FHDMQy87k&amp;feature=related) angle, but man, what an amazing gig.
Muscle weighs more than fat, so you could be offsetting the lost fat with added muscle. It makes a lot of sense considering you just started two weeks ago and you've noticed an improvement in your double chin.  If you're not seeing the scale move yet, start taking measurements of your arms, stomach, etc. Pounds aren't the only measure of weight lost, so don't put too much of a priority on that as the only way to see if you've lost.
Maybe because their culture and traditions have been under siege for thousands of years and they gotta get a plug in where they can?
Oh, I remember Justin Bailey, but something like Final Fantasy just wouldn't have worked with passwords. 
I wish.
Find posts with 100+ comments. Middle-click the link first, then the comments.  Special surprise if it's a 1000+ comment thread.
&gt;I BELIEVE metaphysical claims to be absolutely unknowable at present, therefor I have NO OPINION on the matter.  That's a more retarded view than "I believe something about the universe, but don't know for sure". Why? Because even though we cannot disprove the existence of Jesus-God, we sure as hell can say something about the probability of his existence. 
Lets go!
My stretch marks are going away slowly but surely, mainly as all the loose skin gets reabsorbed.
do you think working retail in a bookstore is easier/harder than working in a department store? (clothes, etc.)  either way, as a fellow retail slave, I feel for you and share you loss of hope in general humanity.
Did she turn you down for sex or something?
I think it's called a "cup o' cheddar" or maybe just a "cup o' cheese" - it prints out that way on my receipts, so I bet it's coded into their POS software.  I, too, order this every time I go to Arby's, and they have never failed to deliver. Ask for a manager if the register person doesn't know what you're talking about, and if the manager can't help you, fire off a quick e-mail to Arby's corporate about the orange county store - you'll get your cheese then!
Yes, absolutely. Like you said - you are in an industry where everyone knows everyone. Despite your childish bosses - acting in a professional way will earn you major points and give you a great reputation. Give the standard two weeks notice, politely explain you have another opportunity, and leave on good terms. You'll never regret it. 
"the US government likes this"
Can I get Describes_NSFW_Links over here?
eggs
Well, that's the easy way of going about it, but I was wondering about redditors' personal favorites as well. Thanks for the links!
Haha yeah, exactly. I posted a message on the blog saying these exact words
If you have it, you don't need it.  If you need it, you don't have it.  If you have it, you need more of it.  If you have more of it, you don't need less of it.  You need it to get it.  And you certainly need it to get more of it.  But if you don't already have any of it to begin with, you can't get any of it to get started which means you really have no idea how to get it in the first place.  Do you? You can share it, sure, you can even stock pile it if you like.  But you can't fake it.  Wanting it, needing it, wishing for it.  The point is, if you've never had any of it...ever...people just seem to know.
LOL what kinda troll is this?
this album is so win! everyone should listen to Renard :D
i have a wireless kb and mouse on that comp but its an old pc i use as my htpc, so it wont play lol, or at least not at a framerate thats playable.
You are acting like they did it because they are unorigional hacks. The duplication was intentional and it works fucking well. PLUS THE FILM IS FUNNY. what the fuck is the problem? eh? were you expecting it to be a meditation on the holocaust?
Why do old people talk about the weather?  It is about establishing a common ground between members of a cultural community.
Brilliant argument, kind sir.
can you be a bit more specific?  are you sure it is a hardware problem?  what has IBM said about it?  where was it purchased?  new or refurb?  accidental damage, or defect in workmanship?
Woah careful, andrewsmith might see this!
There are other sites?
I was offended by the one of me cross dressing. 
As we say in hebrew "gam zu litovah" 
Eh. It doesn't really concern me that much right now. It's finals week for me so I'm not able to play that often. If it's happening next week, though, that will suck.
Zep
I believe gingers have souls! There has to be more like me.
graphics card where?
When I get home, I'm going to draw the crap out of all of you.
You wouldn't stand up for yourself?
This sounds like some solid advice, now if I would stop being a pussy and do it with a little bit more speed and jump a little higher, I might be able to do it! Time to grow a pair and learn this bitch...this weekend though. Too much work :(
Atheists absolutely make that claim. Every day. Constantly. It isn't even worth arguing. 
Can you explain? I don't see what's wrong with hotdogs and pasta...
He says happy birthday!  http://imgur.com/DoBmp
Of course I'd considered that angle, but maybe Amalek doesnt define itself like we do so I'm giving OP the benefit of the doubt on his question as stated.
I prefer to use them because it's less hassle for me. We install 100s of these a year and whatever gets me in and out the quickest while still looking good is ideal.
Go to some more exciting festivals, mate. 
&gt;why do all the young people move out of PA as soon as they can?!?  Yeah. Well. This.
I may have Killzone 2 to trade, I just have to see if someone I talked to last night wants it. If they don't, would you be willing to do that trade?
"A lie told often enough becomes the truth."  Vladimir Lenin
Normally anything above Spring Garden is considered dangerous, at least at night. I know some people who live in that area and are fine but then again I'm near 38th and Powelton and I just got [robbed today](http://www.reddit.com/r/philadelphia/comments/hom5n/robbed_while_in_the_shower/).
WOW. What a coincidence. I had just learned about Bobby Rubio (artist of pic) earlier today, and briefly visited his website. Now, lo and behold here's a pic from the same artist. 
I live in central VT, but I work up in Burlington...right across the pond!
I'm downvoting and saying "Stop it already" each time.
At least I know what the word Bacchic means. Yay for Pushkin (the most famous, and considered best, Russian poet and author, though hardly known outside of Russia). Man could write [inspiring two liners](http://pushkin.niv.ru/pushkin/stihi/stih-439.htm) like no other. Sadly, it's mostly lost in translation. 
37 Minutes later though, I'll come back and tell you that I know what you mean, because my head is definitely above my neck and body.  [5.99 and a half (:]
Good Guy Scott
Just wanted to say thanks to everyone that turned up!!! Sorry I didn't chat with y'all more, a friend of the family randomly turned up out of the blue - over from Australia, oddly enough...  Was awesome to get some Reddit support though - I'm gonna introduce the band to it now I think, they were amazed random internet people came along to see us :)  X
Only the reference boards can be unlocked, and the XFX cards aren't on that list.
Blitzen Trapper
Wait, but she missed the rapture.
Big government small government it doesn't matter to me as long as they can support it and are taxing everyone equally.
The Total Perspective Vortex
yup. they will be reposted on our main site [http://pixelatedgeek.com](http://pixelatedgeek.com)
[Daylight Dies - In The Silence](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-fVtK-_vs5k)
Perhaps someone will soon tell us if this is possible. Until then, here is what I proposed. http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/ho53n/plants_v_zombies_free_at_the_amazon_appstore/c1x2mo4
Just because men are accused of a crime doesn't make it a men's rights issue.  However, feminist jurisprudence and no-drop policies certainly are.  I don't know much about this case, was there any physical evidence or third party testimony?
ah thank you for your patience. As you can tell, this is my first post to r/writing, and I am in fact, young and full hearty. The gall of me to just try and link to my google doc!   but seriously thanks.
Thumbs up? What are you talking about?
It needs to be stressed though, since the anti-capitalistic mentality is so alive and well today in the West, that these private prisons are being financed with *public money*.  Ergo, calling it a failure of capitalism is an enormous error. Capitalism is about voluntary exchanges, while these ones are coercive.
Doesn't that Disney font look an awful lot like the Team Fortress 2 font?  http://i.imgur.com/AXtD0.jpg
Fructis has flat tops.
The irony is that the page strangely took a short while to load and so I decided to read it from the thumbnail.
Hmm. I read that spam prevention as "Pacify", haha. They're trying to stop you. (and yes, I don't have a screenie but I've sent a complaint too).  [Link](http://dynamic.nzherald.co.nz/feedback/email.cfm?user=onlineeditor) for others to do the same.
A core of Kindness a cheerful nature a mind like a dancing challenge a self starting sense of humor firm proportionate curves eyes that smile during sex carves her own destiny a sensual outlaw a life hog
Why don't you bullshit your way through.   Edit: Actually, don't. Because that's what I'm dong and I don't need any more competition. 
This and just starting on the bottom. Not all ceos were once mail clerks but I know someone who started as a lowly debt collector and she is working her way up to being a cpa. The debt collector job had a minimum requirement of a high school diploma, but now she is in with a large financial institution and her experience can be applicable to a resume in accounting.
Most internships these days aren't internships, they are temporary jobs.  If a company cuts a corner like not paying their interns (temporary workers), then they are more willing to cut other corners and isn't a company worth working for.
If someone ever told me that that voice in my head was God (when it's really just me), I would tell them:  "That's impossible. According to your own Bible, God can only dwell in those who believe in Him. I don't, therefore I just proved it's just our own voices in our heads, and not God. Now fuck off."
You win this thread
Yeah, I don't know. I keep seeing it go back and forth when it comes to onions and tomatos. I can eat them while remaining in ketosis, so I don't see a reason to cut them out. I suppose YMMV.
I used to be. And then I saw this link and realized that they all can appear very different :D  http://www.oddballdaily.com/2011/03/15/sculptor-creates-the-great-wall-of-vagina/
I bought some too about three weeks ago now, on sale on Amazon UK for around £80. They're fantastic, great bass (for on-ear headphones that are sub £150-200) and super comfortable: I mainly got them to wear whilst studying or just in my room, whilst I also have some Klipsch Image S4 in-ears that I still think are unbeatable for using anywhere outside the house.
I'm gonna be optimistic and go with she was being sarcastic and you didn't get the joke. *fingers crossed
To be fair, the alternative always seems "I'm sorry that we as a company screwed up". I'd much rather here "I'd be mad too that our company screwed up". A false apology falls on deaf ears.
Walt Disney is a fucking boss. His achievements have influenced most of our lives on so many levels.
Awesome, then definitely check it out, its a whole new game for you to play.
I really have to agree with point 2: *always* be doing something, regardless of where or what it is. As someone told me recently, a couch potato doesn't look that good on the resume. Nor does 3 years of nothing. Thankfully I've never been in that situation, but it's a very valid point.
Didn't you guys see that mythbusters with the movie sounds vs. real sounds.  THAT PUNCH SOUND WAS TOTALLY EDITED IN!!!!!
Can of chilli mixed with mac and cheese, mothafuckas!
Gay much?
I was just at Pizza Hut two days ago and they apparently still have it. The Pizza Hut I go to is the supposed [Haunted Pizza Hut](http://www.liparanormalinvestigators.com/pizzahut.shtml) here on Long Island.
what is it from?
You've been reading too much propaganda from the 30s.  There are studies showing that people driving under the influence of marijuana are actually BETTER drivers. Not to say that people should be allowed to drive under the influence but if it was legalized there would be a good chance that a breathalyzer for cannabis would be high in demand and would be made almost immediately.  As far as age restriction goes, most kids would say its MUCH harder to get alcohol than it is to get weed. Drug dealers don't care about age, liqour stores do.   Bullshit, It has proven medical uses. On-top of that recreational use is safe. It does not cause lung cancer, it does not cause brown lung, it does not kill brain cells, and it does not cause mental illness.   People can just as easily sneak a shot of alcohol in a flask at work if not easier.  Weed is not physically addictive like alcohol. More like gambling. Alcohol is MUCH more addictive and its laughable that you think its not. Weed causes no hangover, or withdrawal.   Just because you think its trashing doesn't mean it should be illegal. I think cigs are trashy, I think they should be legal.  No religion revolves around weed. Weed is NOT the solution to all life's questions. No lives should revolve around weed, weed should revolve around their lives.
I'm not sure why, but I love this place's espresso and coffees.  So delicious.
Do you have download link to the whole album, I hate singles. And before people bitch and complain. I don't buy anything until I'm 1000% happy.
I agree that we need to get some new mods...it must be a butt ton of work for Firi and Aceanuu to do by them selves - much respect goes to them for dealing with the workload.  Maybe there should be a nomination/self nomination thread started, but it would probably need to be Mod generated to give it the stamp of legitimacy. 
I smoke often, maybe 4 or 5 times a week, and I do extremely well in school. I speak 3 languages, have extra-curricular activities, love sports, good group of friends, and not a social outcast at all. There is nothing wrong with the plant itself. It's the people who can't control their use or have underlying problems that are the problem. 
WoW 3 Photos?!?!?!
...and the landlord will also receive the same amount, get first class air fare and a free hotel stay out of it. Will that feel like justice?
What? No sammiches?!? What kind of a bum deal is that?
I totally wanted to troll and go to the Fake Name Generator - which creates an entire personal profile. However, I have two years invested in this business.   Must follow the rules! 
Get Microsoft Security Essentials. Its by far the best free one available, Not intrusive or annoying at all like many other anti-virus, And its made by Microsoft the one who should be dealing with the problem and know best how to do so.   Imho its better then any of the payed ones also. 
Step One: Daily Fail? Delete.
I was trying to see if any of my skype logs had any of my predictions, but as far as the Lakers..  at least I was right about them.  [2/16/2011 11:20:47 PM] Skype: i hope people finally give up the fact lakers will "pull it together" in the playoffs [2/16/2011 11:21:00 PM] Skype: my money on on spurs/mavricks conference finals
Actually, Dawkin's *The Blind Watchmaker* is probably a better introduction to how evolution works that *Greatest Show on Earth* as the latter is really more an overview of the evidence for the theory than an explanation of how it works.  But both are great. And *The Selfish Gene* is a classic as well, but it concentrates on a particularly mind-blowing way of looking at evolution that helps explain aspects of it that are counter-intuitive, such as how altruism could evolve. Daniel Dennett's *Darwin's Dangerous Idea* is also very good, and puts the concept of evolution in a philosophical perspective. 
As long as they fit right.
I agree with that thought. To me though, it seems a bit lame simply because, as a college student, don't we all have only that much crap? I can't say that I had much more than that, and I wasn't a minimalist.  Buy a house or apartment, then show me the storage box. I'd love to knock down the number of stuff I have, but I don't exactly want to sit and sleep on the floor... no couch, chair, or mattress.
Shoulda done a co-op program! :P
it's so much easier said than done. I guess what i'm asking, is how to hit on girls at frat parties. at this point in my life right now, im not looking for a girlfriend, but some casual flings
I also got trade toad
There will surely be a 'reddit' group formed for Cod Elite
* Use http://www.legalzoom.com/ to file. (I have an recommend them)  * File for an LLC in your state. File the classification as a sole proprietorship.  * Check your state &amp; locality for required tax information. You may have to file quarterly estimated taxes.  * When you do your federal income tax return, you'll need to file a schedule C. You'll be able to deduct some of your "business" expenses against your business income. Don't forget about self employment taxes. Turbotax Delux is great for this.
It seems that the second link you give bases an entire argument on the fact that Mathilde Redmatn doesn't exist, which is true (at least within the Red Cross in Gaza). As explained [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/Israel/comments/hof3k/red_cross_no_humanitarian_crisis_in_gaza/c1x2d4t) (and also in the comments in your second link), this name (Mathilde Redmatn) is a poor translation of the Hebrew spelling given by IDF spokesperson in the original Hebrew article [here](http://dover.idf.il/IDF/News_Channels/today/2011/04/2003.htm), מטילד דה רידמטן, which is correctly translated to Mathilde De Riedmatten. (The first link you give is the translation of this Hebrew article, and seems the source of the  spelling mistake.) This person do exist, as your second link states: she is indeed the deputy head of the Red Cross in Gaza.
I'm aware of this. I meant to imply that there were outside influences when it came to the decision to shoot something in 3D, beyond the director or dp. (Though, in my specific example, I'm fairly sure the decision was made to convert the film post filming, although I'm not sure exactly when that decision was made.) I realize now that what I typed wasn't exactly what I wanted to get across. Sorry if I made it sound as if I was ignorant of the process.  I guess if you really think about it, once the decision is made to actually shoot a 3D film, it falls on those doing the shooting to do something creative. Perhaps it's lazy filmmaking at which many should be directing their ire and not 3D itself.
I imagine Gomer Pyle's voice for this guy
I don't blame you for feeling like he somewhat lured you, it does seem that he's been gradually opening you up to the idea for swinging ever since you had that talk about giving "permission".  However, realize that you have the final say in anything you participate in, and you need to stick to it.  Set your boundaries, and STICK to them.  The more wiggle room you give to your boundaries, the easier you are for other to manipulate.
&gt;It is my business if I end up having to cover for you, doing extra work because you're at home, getting paid the same as I am, due to a hangover.  No it isn't.  Your business is with your employer.  It's not your co-workers fault if him leaving for a day (using one of the perks provided in the benefits package) leaves you so short staffed.
the nothing
Also in style: Pee rinses.
I'm tired of everyone getting on weed's dick and preaching that marijuana is harmless. I used to smoke daily and still smoke occasionally and I can list several ways it has harmed/continues to harm me. I would say marijuana should be decriminalized since no one should go to jail over a stupid plant, but why do we have to legalize it?  Tax revenue sure would be nice, but I just don't believe marijuana is that necessary. I'd make medical marijuana available in all states but I'd take a second thought before making it completely legal. Why not just decriminalize it, make medical available in all states, and call it a day? Why do we need to make it more prevalent? Because dumbasses think they're better at everything while high? I'm more creative, but thats about it. Everyone is preaching how great weed is but there are SEVERAL downsides to it that everyone ignores.  I want an answer to this question,  Why do we need to go beyond decriminalization, and medical use, all the way to legalization? And if you think we do, why stop at weed and not go to ecstasy/cocaine/heroine?
Fair enough! I guess I just subconsciously expect r/nfl readers to be highly trained NFL ninjas.  Also, nice anecdote :-)
Over at Swedish in downtown, I visited Brian Higginson once and he was pretty informative and down-to-earth. A bit of a hippy, but he's not really about any of the trendy diets or anything. Cool dude.  That said, after I saw him I read a couple books, Why We Get Fat by Gary Taubes and In Defense of Food by Michael Pollan, and they completely changed my thoughts on nutrition in this country; it was honestly as shocking as anything you read in /r/politics. So I kinda threw out his advice, adapted to an eating lifestyle based on information for those books, and I'm much, much healthier the past few months. Go ahead and subscribe to /r/paleo and enjoy bacon every morning (like a good redditor).
Actually this one was by far my favourite lecturer I've ever had. He was a nice, approachable guy who knew his shit... plus he had a soft Texan (maybe) accent which is uncommon here in Aus, so I loved listening to him lecture. The other Psych lecturers I've had haven't been as awesome, but still not douche bags. 
Well Played.
Your name should be, "Irrelevant wall of text."
13) Gollum
&gt;Kerrigan was a monster, but not by her choosing.  She didn't choose to become infested, no, but it was pretty clear by BW (after she was freed from the overmind) that she enjoyed it and wouldn't want to go back. She had her own free will but chose to screw everyone over because she was bitter and because she could. That's what made her betrayal near the end so bitter for Raynor.   Then she did a 180 in SC2 and was suddenly a braindead monster against her will, true.
Lineage 2. I will always have a soft spot for it.
You sound totally bonkers.  The cosmic consciousness is on your side.
There are a lot of really basic GPS features that Google doesn't have yet.  For instance, being able to search for something along a route instead of just near a location, or avoid an accident up ahead on the current road.  Hopefully they'll add these features over time because although my android phone is a great replacement for my TomTom a lot of the time, it still falls short in some pretty basic areas.
Indeed sir. Indeed!
Well that was what I was going to say my one sure fire deal-breaker is.
For Roku or Boxee? For Roku there is a private channel called [Roksbox](http://www.roksbox.com)  Sorry, I dont own a Boxee Box
It always was a legal justification. I might have explained it better higher up, http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/ho74s/supreme_court_says_it_is_fine_for_the_police_to/c1x2ds9, but just in case:  The difference is that because there was no supreme court precedent, lower courts applied the law differently. So in some states, if destruction of evidence was prompted by police knocking at the door, that meant it didn't justify a search. In those states, things have changed. Police are free to knock on your door and doing so doesn't disqualify them from claiming exigent circumstances if they hear evidence being destroyed.
they have really taken this song a long way from its appearance at Hampton in '09. 
But only for the top 2%, if we lower taxes for everyone than it won't do anything.
I don't care how hot a guy is. I don't know how A) mentally ill he is B) diseased he is C) homicidal he is D) violent he is. I will take a big ol' pass.
Yes, Hitler was a christian, examples were of a) evil atheists, b) evil christians c) evil muslims. In the end, most important thing is not whether you're believer or nonbeliever, but whether you're an genocidal maniac or not. Or a fanatic follower of one. Trust me, I know, I'm from the Balkans ;)
I have one of these, theyre great
You'll be converted, and the grocery stores carry Pepsi. So all in all it's not bad.
Was out painting with a few friends in an abandoned factory area (before I cop all the downvotes, we were only painting on these abandoned warehouses, not houses), there were 4 of us &amp; we were all hitting this one giant wall - one guy was up a ladder, one was laying a fill in throwie &amp; me and another guy were just bombing all over.   It was a pretty open street, right off a main road - cars would've been able to see us from 100m either way..but it was late so we were having fun.  As usual, we were keeping our eyes open for anything we had to run from - and suddenly a car chimes in from the end that comes off the busy road.  We stop, put our cans in our belts &amp; just start walking away from the car (walking in the same direction the car was driving).  One friend stopped and looked back, trying to work out whether it was a cab or a cop car..it was dark &amp; there was minimal street lighting so he wasn't able to tell at first - but as it got closer, we realised it was a cop car.  We acted cool, didn't run or anything - because we didn't know if the cop had seen us getting up. The cop drives up to us &amp; slows down, sees that we all have backpacks &amp; tells us to put our bags down and get up against the wall.  We do so, but we keep our bags right in front of us and make sure they're zipped up.  He stays in the car (he is clearly very overweight, so it's possible that he was expecting a bit of a chase) and starts asking us questions in an awkward mannor - using phrases like "are you boys out for a spray?" "let us see your andhays" etc..finally he asks us what he have in the bags.  3 of us are wise enough to not answer any of his questions (he hasn't asked for ID yet, thankfully) but one of my friends who hasn't really dealt with the police in this type of situation before decides to OPEN UP HIS BACKPACK, SHOW THE CANS TO THE OFFICER AND SAY "yeah sorry officer, we have paint - here it is."  The rest of us are standing there brain-palming all thinking "What the fuck did you just do to us."  The cop tells my friend to put the bag down &amp; tells us all to stay there while he gets on his radio &amp; calls for backup.  He informs us that he has a dog in the car (he obviously doesn't, as we can see through the windows) and that if we run, he will set the dog on us.  Anyway, as he's on the radio, one of my friends (funnily enough, a guy who doesn't actually paint and who isn't the kind of guy to take the initiative in a situation like this) whispers something along the lines of "I can't get done for this shit dudes, I'll love my job and my parents will kick me out.  On the count of three, we fucking run - are you guys in?".  It shot through our heads the shit that we could get into, and we all whisper "yep".  He counts down from three, the cop is still on the radio and isn't paying attention to us - and we hit the legs.  If you can imagine that this T is where we are, the top of the T is the street we're on, the bottom of the T is where we run.  I don't know what the cop did at this moment in time, but we were running while ditching our bags over fence.  My pants were falling down because I had them loosened in order to fit 2+ cans in my belt, my friends were in the same situation - so we're running AS FAST AS WE CAN in the middle of nowhere while trying to tighten our pants.  Obviously the details of where we ran won't mean anything to people here, so I'll just go through what happened:  - We got rid of the cans, but we could see the flashing lights of the car behind us.  We run around blocks trying to loose the car, and eventually hide in someone's backyard.  A woman comes out of her house and starts yelling "GET THE FUCK OUT OF MY YARD, I'VE CALLED THE POLICE AND THEY'RE ALMOST HERE".  We apologize and gtfo of her yard, running up her street and trying to work out where the car is (at this point we've only run around the block, so we pretty much know where the car is going to be coming from).  We hide behind big bins, but after a while we realize that one of our friends is missing - we have no idea when we lost him or where he is *will cover this later*  - We realize that the girlfriend of one of our friends lives somewhere near where we are, so we try and work out where her apartment is and start moving.  We've lost the cop car by now, but we can't do anything because I had driven to the area that we were painting &amp; if you remember the 'T', my car was parked on the bottom line.  We ran past my car, and for all we know - the cop is still hanging around the street taking photos of what we'd done (they do this in our area).  We try and keep in the shadows while moving to where the friends girlfriend's place is.  Long story short, we got there - tried to call her but her phone was off.  We didn't know which house she was, so we just hung around in the car park for a while.  Someone yells "GET THE FUCK OUT OF OUR CARPARK, WE'VE CALLED THE COPS".  We shit brix.  - We wander around, trying to hide just until shit blows over.  We're trying to call the friend who went missing, but then stop calling - thinking that if he's been caught, the cop will have his phone and will put 2 + 2 together..not that they would track the call or anything hi-tech, but they would have our numbers.  We figure we can leave the car there (we were only a suburb away from where 2/3 of us lived) and start heading towards the main road closest to where we are to catch a bus.  As we get close to the main road, 2 cop cars drive towards us.  Again, we hit the legs and hide in an apartment carpark - we all had jackets on so we take our jackets off and hide them in a trailer along with the rest of the markers we had on us.  We start walking towards the car, taking an extreme diversion so we can see whether the cop car is near my car.  (Will finish story in next post, apparently it's too long)
my dad (an atheist) threw in a “yyyyyaaaaaaaaaayyyyyyy god." 
That's cutting it pretty tight. I get this alot in Leeds when riding in the bus lanes. The rider (not sure if it's the OP) wasn't *really* in the cycle lane though. He was right in the middle of the motoring lane. The other cars did right to overtake as much as they did and give room - but that taxi driver probably thought the rider was in his lane and was far too stubborn in making his point. 
Well, he's quiet happy about it, isn't he... *Wild abra used teleport*
I only opened the video because I saw Charlie in the thumbnail. 
Pfft. Ssb4 is all I need.
1. Time out your advanced guard to break the rhythm of their combos. If you can space them out, you give yourself more options to work with.  2. Find the assists that punish high pressure. Haggar, Tron, etc. Obviously you have to work out the timing and make sure you have assists that will help with OTG as well, but this depends on play style. 3. Take online with a grain of salt. Consider I play the majority of my MvC3 offline with some strong players, you can tell how lag changes your tactics. The people I play with that do Mag's ROM loops and fly/unfly BnB's say they can be at times pointless to try to execute on someone with a laggy/high latency connection.
Oh *my*.
That "liberation kit" is overpriced crap though. A normal pentalobe screwdriver is available for $1 or look at [this kit.](http://www.amazon.com/Pentalobe-Screwdriver-Size-Repair-iPhone/dp/B004KDEWTS/)
**High School** graduation
"Good news, everyone!"
wait what, are you serious? 
I can confirm this. Two of the girls I grew up with, and who are like sisters to me, turned out really hot. While it would be too incestual for me to date either of them, going out to party with them was a really easy way to get girls interested and talking.
the forest is peaceful because of the ents.
&gt; 31 / F  She's a *woman*, yo.
why did i both clicking this?
&gt;I want someone who can get excited about technology and enjoys it because they're bound to be better at it.  Baseless assumption. Look outside: every single person you see has something they're good at but don't enjoy.
I wonder how many *distinct* people signed this. It says 500,000 now, but I can see a lot of people signing multiple times with bullshit phrases/names coming through the "recent sigs" feed
Half of India's economy is "under the table" anyways ;). 
I'll just go ahead and concur with the both of you.
Fighting atheist made a video about this on youtube named , you are not agnostic
Aw, I thought he was going to complain about not having any statues. 
thank you for not using a photo of a red one...i may very well have thrown my god damn computer. ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh.
Because I have a mountain of student debt, and the interest from 30k line of credit makes angels weep.  Next question.
Not counting the physics, right? Nvidia crippled it for us ATI users.   I'm running a 4870 and I can push high settings, no more, I think it's time to upgrade my PC some.
Yeah sorry about that...
They're going to put new numbers on the comic books? So next out will be Issue #1 even though it's actually issue #984? And this is important because...?
Children are the future, unless we stop them now.  -Homer Simpson
Hey rockyourguitar. I would love one of these. I'm actually applying for a job in a guitar shop here in Ireland and am reading my way through repair books, this would be a pretty cool tool to have and would save me a lot of time! Cheers.
Scott Harvey, can't recommend enough.  Andrew Murray if he's available.  Both of them are insanely nice, make great wine, and are always willing to open a bottle and chat if they're at the vinyard.  Look 'em both up online, and call the winery phone numbers to see who's around.
Why do it at all?  I mean, these people are acting foolish just to cause problems and to prove a point (that they want to be able to dance *there*).  Yeah, it is a shitty interpretation of the law but, come on, what is it going to solve?  Nothing came out of it but a funny clip of people acting silly just to act silly.
yes? what about?
A *lot* of languages (around a quarter of them) mark evidentiality on their verbs, but English (and most European languages) don't. This means that, for example, in Eastern Pomo, you would conjugate a verb differently depending on whether:  * You experienced the action firsthand ("Cheetos make you throw up. I know because I ate some cheetos and I threw up.") * You had direct evidence that it happened ("Cheetos make you throw up. I know, because I saw Elmer eat cheetos and then saw him throw up.") * You had circumstantial evidence that it happened ("Cheetos make you throw up. I know, because I bought a bunch of cheetos for my friends, and when I came by the next day, there was vomit everywhere.") * Or, you're reporting what you've been told ("Cheetos make you throw up. I know, because I heard about it on Oprah.")  Other languages have other systems, though. Check out the [wiki page](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Evidentiality) for more details.  I should note, though, that you *can* make these distinctions in English, as I've done above, but you don't *have* to. If you said "Cheetos make you throw up." in the first way to a Pomo speaking guy, and later he found out that you learned that from Oprah, he'd be mad at you for lying to him. Whereas in English, it would only be a lie if you explicitly said you experienced it firsthand.
In the front of *The Dark Tower* there is a list of all King's books, with the Dark Tower related books emphasized. I'd read all those.
There's a story here...
I do I'd buy that shit and I'm a dude
He killed a man with sharpened boat ore.
On the stand, the sign says the title is "Fat Tony" ...WTF?!
do you mean battlearmor? mechwarrior's the pilot inside.
You may not save often, but Logic usually has a backup folder in the project folder with incremental backups. You can open the latest one pre-mess from the browser window and import the track settings, overwriting the messed up ones.
Really? Back when I lived in Washington, I used to go hiking all the time and just an hours drive out of Seattle I'd hardly see any other people in the mountains and valleys. I think it's only if you go to the official state parks, that's where the crowds are, but it's the same way here in Japan too. 
I'll go with:  RON PAUL 2012, JOIN THE CULT!  If I win I would prefer a Romney 2012 T-shirt. Thanks!
looks fake
Haha I could see it: As requested, IAm OJ Simpson, got away with murder. AMA (except shit about football)
I'm more than willing to upgrade again if/when the radiation bodycount starts to compare...
http://i.imgur.com/waTgS.jpg IS such a hot pose! I love it! Keep up the great work!
Well, let's just say I have some interesting political/social views.  I'm a Navy officer that thinks the military is too big, a social conservative that thinks we spend too much, and generally an opponent of things that perpetuate the welfare state.  The ACLU tends to take cases that I disagree with such as things like NAMBLA or the rights of illegal aliens, or the right for a terrorist to have a taxpayer funded trial with a jury.  But my views are shifting as I get older.  I have recently changed my outlook on the war on drugs (stupid, costly, generally a victimless crime) and may end up being a bleeding heart liberal before I die.
I met this girl at a friend's house party. Hooked up with her. Got her email. Later, friended her on Facebook, talked to her online almost everyday for a good two weeks or so. She lived a few towns over, about 45 minute drive, so we couldn't really meet up, but I was banking on running into her again so I could hook up with her again. One day, she tells me that she's coming to a friend's birthday party and she's gonna be right near me, and asks what I'm doing that Friday. I say nothing, and she implies that we might be able to hang out afterwords. I tell her yeah maybe we can do something (still hoping to hook up with her afterwords. Keep in mind she had mentioned that she enjoyed it the first time we did it at the house party). I was in class at the time, and for some stupid reason I decided to message my friend (the guy who's house party I had met her at) and mention that I might hook up with her that Friday. Later, I get home and have a bunch of messages from her bitching me out. I message her and ask what's up. Turns out that moments after I talked to him, this asshole messages her and tells her that I said I'm going out with her and I think we're dating. I say no. She shows me a part of the conversation he sent her. I say that's not what I said (he edited out where he asked if we were dating and I said no just hooking up). She calls me a stalker and blocks me. I email him and ask what the fuck. He doesn't get back to me until I email him multiple times, and basically tells me to fuck off and stop bothering him about it. I delete him from messenger/Facebook. Never found out what his motivation was (everything seemed fine the last time I talked to him at the party).  Oh, and I forgot to mention that the reason I couldn't prove it is because I didn't automatically save MSN conversations at the time. Since then, I had to change my settings so I'd always have proof of what I said. Sad, huh? 
The hatred definitely comes from playing Angry Birds and receiving a useless text message. OH THE RAGE.
Thanks everyone!
I'm only messing der skeed, Juicey la!
The healthiest aspect is proper portion sizing and plenty of daily exercise (from commuting).  I'm reminded of this fact every time I return to Texas after an extended stay in Japan.
18, senior in High School, I'm scared of the world.
I was saddened to learn that my grandmom was a racist.  I warned her that the Republicans would take down Social Security.  Her complaining about a black woman as the First Lady.  Me, telling her she should watch as Republicans destroy Medicare, her telling me how she loved that Bill O'Rielly.  And then that all of them are just the same. Me telling her that Democrats aren't funded by right-wing extremists, like the Crack Brothers, err, Koch Brother's.  Grandmom didn't raise anyone to be racist, isn't that funny?
And then another few weeks for the porno parody: **Dick Attack 3D**
I'd recommend The Mountain Goats.
My favorite part is the nutcracker in the background
It's A Trap
he may be a whiny cunt, but you think he's wrong? everything he's said is true, the game is completely based on shock value entertainment. kids who dont know any better will look at it and emulate it.
Shit. I'm sure there are plenty in your area unless you are already in prison for being a sexual predator.
This post had me confused, then I realized I had been confused and that the person being requested was neither alexander grey nor sasha shulgin
the circle of life.
You could probably start your own site and make a lot of money. You'd have to show your face, but still.
Well I'm 21, still living at home. I'm in no debt whatsoever, but I tend to spend wayy too much when going out on the weekends.
We didn't change the factual definitions. There are two competing systems and we prefer to use the one with philosophical and etymological backing rather than the one used by apologists.  But, really, the labels don't matter. You can call me Sally if that's what you want to, but I'm still here to talk about why your god doesn't heal amputees.
OPTIC BLAST! 
hahahahahaha
Small screen?  I'm at 1440x900 at that's what it looks like to me.  Or is 1440x900 small these days?  This thing was a fucking widescreen when I bought it!
[](/megusta)
If you're only having trouble with a minus sign, it's probably easiest just to think of the shape of the curves. Sine has an upward slope at 0, so its derivative must be positive at 0, so it must be +cosine. The slope of cosine goes from positive to negative at 0, i.e. its derivative goes from positive to negative at 0, so it must be -sine.
I am seriously obsessed with his hair in that show.
If I don't understand a stitch, I google how to do it and read the top three tutorials.  Reading how to do it from 3 different points of view often helps me piece together the gaps and fill in the info I need to do the stitch.  And if that doesn't work?? Youtube.  :)
Oh I'm sure about that!  Eesh, fueling the fire.
13 Gollum
&gt;This is also a guy that joined the Air Force in 1962 not knowing about Vietnam.  Not knowing *what* about Vietnam? The US was still in the "advisors" stage then. He would have no reason to expect to be sent to war there. Headlines in the papers were all about the Bay of Pigs fiasco and the Berlin Wall going up. I doubt anyone running Air Force boot camp even knew about Vietnam *themselves*.
IoB, 2 or more if you can get them with someone to trade with is a really solid start. Especially if you prefer the IoB Sea Guard to the typical, blocky spearmen. Swordmasters may not be everyone's favorite special choice, but they are really fun and running a big block is still viable. The Army Book needs to be had of course. 
Happiness. Plain and simple. Yes, a certain degree of wealth contributes to that. But, statistically, [not as much wealth as you might think.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Happiness_economics#Individual_income)  To me, being happy is being intellectually fulfilled, feeling needed, and most importantly, having someone to be in love with.
Professor Oak came when he heard about this fight.
Only r/trees can perpetuate a meme started by the person in the picture. Come on...
Don't worry, I won't ever speak of this again. Except of course at your wedding and or funeral. Oh and you're right about Bornstein, he's a bench player extraordinaire. 
&gt;Even though the two are different experiences I see a state of cosmic consciousness as a stepping stone to astral projection, for me.  OK :)  But in my opinion, having experienced both, astral projection is roughly 1000 times easier than cosmic consciousness.  But that's just me.  I think astral projection is a realistic goal for almost anyone, just like lucid dreaming.  Cosmic consciousness without drugs, while sober, is not so easy.  &gt;It is easier now for me to experience my consciousness outside my body after practicing by visualizing the event to occur. My consciousness slowly started to shift from my body to where I was visualizing it. Eventually they are the same and then I find myself exactly where I was visualizing.  Nice! :)  I like this.  &gt;I cannot forget rituals, not specifically in the context of astral projection, I am a perfecting Rosicrucian so rituals are just a part of life.  Perfecting?  Do you mean practicing?  I am generally against rituals.  But I am not a Rosicrucian.  So you might be a good person to ask, what is the main premise of Rosicrucianism, and are you enjoying it?  What have you learned from it?  I think that a ritual can be a potent help when it's conscious and fresh.  But the more some ritual gets repeated, the more rote and robotic it becomes.  It loses its freshness and becomes just a bunch of motions to go through.  So I don't discount the rituals altogether, but I think for the most part they tend to degrade and to lose potency.  I also agree with Austin Osman Spare that rituals have at least a degree of insincerity to them.  For example, if I want to walk I walk.  I don't perform a ritual so that I may walk.  Why?  Because my walking is sincere.  It's something I am truly capable of doing.  So performing a ritual is like a reminder of one's incapability and impotence.  I always thought so on my own, even before I read about Spare.  But like I said before, I don't think rituals are completely useless, because sometimes we need every help we can get and even if walking on crutches is not the same thing, it may be better than nothing.  So if I were to express this in numbers, while I can admit that rituals can help (when they are fresh, before they had a chance to become robotic, boring and rote), I would break it down as rituals:3 to no-rituals:7, in terms of the score, where the score represents efficacy or importance.
[Now in merchandise form!](http://www.topatoco.com/merchant.mvc?Screen=PROD&amp;Store_Code=TO&amp;Product_Code=CG-TROPHY&amp;Category_Code=WON)  (From [this](http://catandgirl.com/?p=1002) comic.)
Boyfriend: "hey I came across this really cool site the other day, but I'm not sure if I should share it right now"   Me (studying for final exams): "psh, I have self control"   Boyfriend: *le link*  Week later.  Me: "damn you." 
Do you mean who do I want to be like?  The Big House, of course.
Yah I love when people get on reddit see something on a link from somewhere else then try to use it for themself. Yay. I also saw this today and those pictures of the most epic dating site troll are just too good.
That's nice.
I'm pretty sure I would have heard about that whole 'no-fly zone over Texas' the Feds  said they'd impose, if this were true. Edit: don't get mad at me because your article isn't true and the title is sensationalist. That's on you, not me.
They are way cheaper and you can get badass brands like these.  Japanese condoms are super thin, way better than any of the American brands.
it looks like jon lovitz
Did you end up getting an appointment with your doctor? 
As always don't confuse normal people with people of reddit.
They do other nice things too. Last winter I was walking home drunk late at night (6am) . A police car drove by, asked me if I wanted a ride, drove me to my door. 
I want a netflix block button.  Netflix seems hell bent on having me watch "Enrique Iglesias Hot and Fluffy"
This looks like it will be great to try. I like how they are using coconut and crushed peanuts as the breading instead. I bet this will work with a lot of other things as well. Thank you!
I can probably help immensely since I've been playing a Swarm Druid for pretty much half a year in my current campaign. But I'd first have to ask what sort of character you want beyond that, since my druid focuses heavily on Wild Shape and off-tank controlling (see: Clinging Drones.)
heyooooo whats up bitches
I think enthusiasm is the key here. He needs to show that he's ready to learn and willing to do what she asks with all the vigor of youth
I *wish* kids would say Tool at the end of that sentence!
That was another quip on your weird title phrasing. You'll be getting a lot of them.
/joke
My current job was found on craigslist. I've had more responses (including negatives) from craigslist than most other resources.
You can tell her that instead she can have god put all her shit back downstairs next weekend.
I think that a lot of people overlook the core devs on many projects and focus on people maintaining esoteric libraries.  I think these guys are well worth watching both on Twitter and on the mailing lists.
Fionn Regan
&gt;In other words, you may be paying less per square foot but you would also be paying a higher rent because I doubt you will be able to find a decent place in the financial district for $1650.  The other guy didn't say that though did he.  No, he made it sound like you'd be stupid to pay more than him in Manhattan.  I merely pointed out that not everyone in manhattan want's to waste their money living in a rat shelter with one window.
Lay off the Victorians.  They are not that bad.
Did someone say girl? Do an r/gonewild! Please...
I did this with Corki once - I spotted an invis eve with my Q (when it revealed invis units), and I went full rambo on her - Ignite, chaingun, and rocket spam. My last rocket was a big one that i shot blind and I killed her with it. It was a very /flex moment.
Would I need to use a boolean function to determine whether it is a vowel and have it add to a counter?
Do you not understand what approximately means? It's an average, sheesh. Midgets, while, small and good to put into movies for a cheap laugh, still count as a whole human being.
It's always weird when someone says I look like someone else because then I feel like I have a doppelganger somewhere... &gt;.&gt; 
I thought I was late when I started pre-alpha.
Yes I was, I finished playing fallout 3 a couple of days ago and cant stop listening to crunchy old jazz.
Game of Thrones!
My family is there and they are having some difficulties due to the job market. I would rather be closer to home to be able to help support them anyway I can. Plus, I have friends there I have had for over 15 years. Good close friends. It's alot of fun here and very social. I've done a lot and met a lot of people, but sometimes quantity doesn't make up for quality. Plus...well...it's still fucking Texas. They still have some hillbilly in them.
As the wife of Clarence Thomas, I can confirm this. He also recused himself from our tawdry sexual exploits last night.
I wish I had more than one to give.
You are my brother.
where is the place the caibbean or polynesian?
I had a downstairs neighbor that would blast elvis music, but if I walked across the room he'd bang on his ceiling. [](/jackieeeee! "who blasts elvis?")
So, when my friend asks me what's bothering me, she's telling me how attracted she is? 
vodafone support is already shit.
Another NYC reporting in! Is it limited to only one per location? :)
Please... please, go back to Youtube!
That is what I figured thanks for confirming.
&gt; tastes like shit  so it tastes like an energy drink??
How is this a bias when it's obviously true that things are getting better in the long run? 
Oakville '05
He is right, just because someone says "oh my god" doesn't mean the speaker was invoking a literal god. When you say something is cool or hot, you can be referring to its temperature or you could be using those terms as slang which has a complete different meaning. "Oh my god" has 0 religious meaning to me and I use it on occasion. Same with god damn it.   "God bless you" I never use, and I do feel like it has religious connotation. I think there are people who could view it as a reflexive statement, with no religious meaning, but I would ask that those people stop and think about what they are doing and make a change. 
if your complaining about the ttc, the seat sizes are probably the least of our problems kids 
&gt; When it's her stop to get off the bus or train, just ask her: "Can I walk you back to your place?"  That is horrible advice. The fact you're asking, and how you suggest he goes about it, it just screams "needy", among other things--none of which are positive.
Arceus created all. I think math is under all, isn't it?
Only one possible response:  http://i.imgur.com/cM8Fa.jpg  Yeah, keep counting on that pepper spray.
Oh man, come on. Fancy phones? Fancy TVs? Cars? Sure, they might have _slightly more practical_ uses... but they're mostly to show off. I'm not picking on you, but you have to admit that.  Edit: The point is... Guys like to show off just as much as girls. Be it tools, whatever. They like to show off. Guy's stuff might have _some_ practical uses (entertainment, sure) but they still like to show off.
IStillSeeWires
I believe the website is http://www.pexpeppers.com/ 
Don't eat a carton of ice cream and Oreos. 
I completely disagree with you.  1.  Fuck the "Life Lottery" bullshit.  You make your own destiny.  2.  You don't like you life, change it.  3.  When you give your **EMPLOYER** the power to control your destiny, you shit on everyone who fought and died to give you the freedom to live as you see fit.
I'll probably get downvoted, but I love Primeval for the utter campiness of it. The 5th season just started last week, but they are pretty short seasons so easy to catch up on.  And of course, if you haven't watched Being Human yet, run don't walk.  EDIT: It's possible I should have read your whole post before commenting. Yeah, I got nothing.
Well it got my goat for heavens sake. What? Ah ha!
keep posting! :)
From memory I think it was just over 45%
Sadly, yes. He's dead. Not that I would want to carve up a live cat!  This is part of my AVMA required curriculum for studying to be a veterinary technician.  I'm so very grateful for his sacrifice, and my greatest hope is that I can use the knowledge to save the lives of many, many other pets.
Cheers to everyone that came along!!  Hope your ears were not too offended :D
&gt; fter this long and this much dedication, I realize that I wanted no one but her for the rest of my life, and also that I can't really function without her.  2 years is not much time. That is only 8 seasons.  Depression is a natural reaction to this loss. Deal with the depression first. Please seek out a mental health counselor.  Good luck, cheers, all the best, we are cheering for you and your future.
I think you accidentally a
yes, because someone will definitely want to steal some low-res pics of your sick kid
I make $9/hour assisting the developmentally disabled. When I was hired, I was told I would be working full time, which would be just enough to live on. Now, my boss is only giving me about 25 hours a week. This barely covers my rent, let alone gas, toiletries, and food. I'm currently looking for a second job. 
Hated this show, almost every non-human character freaked me out.
Not compatible with my phone..  Blargh :(
If I do will you rape me.
I have a Gilbert Brown signed football. He has always been my favorite player. 
Pretty awesome, but – correct me if I'm wrong – wasn't a fair amount of that footage from seasons 1-3?
Personally I'd rather see made-up work than nursing home DM. If you feel the DM shows a certain skill (like retail design or direct response copy) include one or two. But if you know you're capable of more, prove it. Do the work you want to be doing. I think made-up book work shows real drive, especially when it's thought through properly and worked up nicely. People with 20 years ad experience still have books full of scam ads. The difference is they don't admit it's made up.  I don't know much about pharma. The pharma creatives I've met are more like doctors - with a huge medical knowledge and very little creative freedom. But if a very creative person with a fascinating book happened to have 2 years in pharma earning good money, I would never hold that against them.  Hope that helps a bit.
If anyone wants to get into the game and would like some help, just hit me up on xfire or steam.  Steam: Chewy_Solo (Alias: Z Naught) Xfire: bf2chewy  The server that those guys are playing in is the TacticalGamer.com server, which I highly recommend. 
What on earth is a chusband?
meh
[relevant](http://i.imgur.com/OZ9Gm)
Is the board a wizard?
What people don't understand is that the body has the ability to repair itself. They're just attributing their recovery to alternative medicine or in this case: acupuncture.
two holes after the one headed to the parking lot(thats 11). 12 runs right down the parking lot, then 13 is the super long uphill one headed towards the ball field and the restrooms.
I am so fucked. 
Please use gentle push.  PLEASE USE GENTLE PUSH
Side story: At GDC in San Francisco a few years ago, CCP Games (of Eve Online) was quietly handing out invitations to developers for an exclusive after-conference party, as a recruiting event.  This is the first and only time I've been invited to a cool party.  My work friends and I show up, it's like 10pm, at a cool club in SF that CCP had completely rented out.  The music was a custom mix of Eve's soundtrack, and the screens were showing gameplay.  Unlimited free drinks and snacks.  They had a great club atmosphere; perfect dark lighting, perfect music volume, good corners for talking, good seating, and so on.  It was absolutely amazing to be having a party with a bunch of developers.  We got to meet guys from other companies, talk shop, talk about CCP - incredible experience.  There were sexy waitresses going around serving drinks.  We got buzzed enough to start flirting with one.  Here comes the point of this story: CCP Games had ONLY hired people who were true gamers.  It wasn't flaunted, but as we started to talk with one friendly girl, turns out she was a huge WoW player, with a Warlock and as much experience as any of us.  Completely blew my mind.  Someday, I'll have a company, and I swear I'm going to throw recruitment parties like this ^^  
If you need any tips just ask me :D
&gt;Is there an agreement on how it was meant to practiced? :). I don't think so. No wonder, the same texts produce so many different sects/beliefs.&lt;  Sunni Islam, pretty much the middle path that hasn't broken off.  As for the purpose of life. Islam pretty much says the purpose of life is to worship God, live a good life, and reproduce as to advance as a species in the world.  The "live a good life" can be anything that person wants. If someone wants to be a doctor, they can do that. If they feel the need to stop crime, they can do that too. 
Oh how sweet - she made you a card *for the last time you'll ever have sex with her!*  Cause, once they're married with kids....
Yeah I mean that makes sense, I need to start these good habits now before I get stuck.
Put this Thomas thing on hold for a sec...Suppose ObamaCare is brought to the Supreme Court.  Could any of you Libs give me some good arguments as to WHY Obamacare is constitutional? Obamacare is a clear violation of the tenth amendment...no doubt about it.  The federal government has no right to regulate health care.  Romneycare is constitutional because the STATES have the right to regulate health care...not the other way around.
I would love to hear them ask this to Palin or Romney.
I don't know... I think it's safe to say that facebook is much larger and more popular than myspace ever was
It doesn't matter to him, he's a superstar and he bangs a supermodel... what does he care about what we think about his hair?
That's because males with female friends are less likely to make a mask out of your face skin. It's science.
Some small consulting firms do the bulk of the design and then subcontract out to others.  Depends on the company I guess and what they do.  Can you give any more info?  The defense industry is really really large.
This is the same area I live in. We should start a neighborhood watch.
She's not touching my wiener!
WOW the response has been incredible. I'm going to do a follow up tomorrow afternoon giving away the sex toys. I'll send you a link to participate! Good luck. 
I don't know why, but I really love degaussing. A lot. But I still don't want a monitor 'upgrade'.
that's not how you circlejerk, my friend.
If a game requires GFWL, then it deserves a pirate.
Grow up. Life does NOT work the way Hollywood and your "heart" (irrational emotion) says. The FASTER you do this, the BETTER off you will be.
Unfortunately that's the original meaning to internet trolling, the meaning has softened over the years.
I meant to type this in the description.  Don't you love it when they go around yelling "Y O U LO SE"? even though you're the ones that just won?  In the picture, we won TB just a few minutes before that, and this guy decided to approach our base to keep yelling.
I think you meant to say "thanks" instead of "that's".
Haha, yeah dude, it's really awesome. Even cooler is you can load more than one subreddit as well and it'll tell you which tracks are from what sub. I really love it and use it pretty much anytime I'm listening to reddit.
Thats because they bundle the letters in a bigger envelope and call it a package. If they would offer this service straight to residences (or small business), they would be breaking the law (because one residence will not send enough letters to "bundle" them).
[Relevant/NSFW](http://images.t-nation.com/forum_images/6/8/68eaf_ORIG-hot_reality_girl_soccer_demotivational_poster.jpg)
No. Clowns scare kids.
They're
In soviet America, president assassinates you.
Nicely put, I hate the stick that agnostic atheists get. Atheists think they get it bad but we're shit on by both sides for either not believing or sitting on the fence.
Well I guess for those you need to work somewhere else first. From my college, a lot of people end up working at one of the places they had an internship at while in school.
I cannot downvote this enough.
Remember when the comment section was a place to read and participate in conversations with people? instead of spouting some stupid joke to earn points that serve no purpose whatsoever.
What experience?  You won't learn anything there.  Get an internship.
Same thing, but with my mom! :)
Team effort. All ways has been and always will be :)
So, what's Britney like when she phone sexes? We need details here! What does she say, does she moan the way she does in "Three"?
it took me a second to realize what that was a picture of. then i got scared and closed my laptop.
First contact.  I'm holding out in my lifetime just for the first visual light in high resolution capture of a terrestrial exoplanet.
Why do you assume the two are mutually exclusive? I am a USMC combat vet who encourages most people, depending on their situation, to avoid service. My reasons should be obvious to anyone in the military who pays attention to bigger picture issues. Just because I have a different opinion than many military guys doesn't mean I have to be quiet. 
Blogspam, not even FOSS related, very old.
You really need to know how to micro like a boss.  QXC danced his reapers up and down those cliffs while keeping his medivac safe from those queens while expanding and building marines and tanks at his base.
I was curious to how effective these were. Thanks for sharing.
While I agree it is one of the best sitcoms (the best?), the OP specifically asked for series that are not humour based or sitcoms.
[http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/City_of_Men](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/City_of_Men) If you liked city of god, this is a similar idea I think made by the same people. I watched the entire series at work in about a week (before reddit, had a lot of free time), fucking unbelievable show.
You laugh, but I worked in subway with a guy with a PhD is electronics. I felt so sorry for him.
Agreed. Except for this one. The very first one that I've enjoyed.
I'm waiting eagerly!
I definitely agree, and I liked the story and all that, but the game was so easy it just bored the hell out of me. I was never once at risk of losing a single battle. If it was merely a cartoon I could just sit back and watch, I might do that.
I could not agree more.
I get that a lot, I'll take it as a compliment.  Of course I could play the idea of a secret identity... &gt;.&gt; lol but if you check through my comments I've been claiming to be a 13 year old for a long time I'd have to be really dedicated to keep my alias up.
That works, too. The E-Uni channel helped me a lot when I was new.
Sounds like a fun party, I wouldn't sweat about it.
I edited it, and now everyone else looks silly! Mwhahaha But seriously guys, let's keep the advice coming...
GamerGenesis
Are you joking man?  Virtually every major media company right now is pushing the story line about how nuclear is much safer than coal.  There are literally thousands of these stories coming out weekly.
It'll be C#, that's why they'll need to grow shit loads of babies for the overhead. 
Request, this picture and MANY others can be found [here](http://sharpieinpooper.tumblr.com/page/2).
so I'm not allowed to discuss characters now?  Okay, I'm 23 years old, I was reading these as they came out and going to midnight releases, sorry if I feel like there are characters that have depth that is worth conversation...  (go away troll)
I find your goal honorable and your enthusiasm inspiring. I'll pray that God grant you the strength to serve our country as a Ranger. Go get em!
David Firth is brilliant, there's so many great cartoons of his. Check out the website. www.fat-pie.com
Be prepared for a bout of self righteous radicalism at the beginning followed shortly by the long period of depressed cynicism for the country.  I'm serious.
goodbye and thanks for all the fish
Chill, what your wife did has never been done before. She's obviously a freakin' genius because of this. 
North Korea has been under a dictatorship for so long, I wonder if the general populace even understands the concept of relative freedom. Though, I guess from the occasional successful defections that occur from time to time, some must.
Air bags only go off if you impact something..... If you are rear ended it is the headrest catching your brains
This subreddit is usually reposts (Note all the Herobrine shit that's clogging up the place now) so I figured it was gonna start with this now.
not I. 
Own any chokers? You're beautiful. But if you're taking any requests, that would be mine.
I had almost all my applications in before I would have received my LSAT score.  I even heard back from the school I will now be attending before I would have probably heard back about my LSAT score. Take the rolling admissions seriously.  Apply early.  
Eh, he or she has been on reddit for four years, so it's unlikely that it's a phishing scam.   Still, there's no reason not to include the site in a job posting.
Dirk's like, Get her a ring cause I'm about to get my own
See someone land on Mars. I'm 24 years old and at the rate we're going i can't see it happening in my life time. The most frustrating thing is it's nothing to do with the technology available. 
Firefly is *definitely* worth the shot. If you're into well written, well directed, and well casted sci-fi shows. like stargate.
To a juicer it would...
Using the rebate once. I see now.  That makes sense. Bastards.
I'll take one! Want a wish eevee?
Skyfire plays it. For those wondering, it's a horse fucking a dude. I'd say very NSFW.
Looks pretty good on the infuse.  The backgrounds (house, porch, fence) look a little washed out, but all the sprites look great.
you're a retarded cunt
He makes you look like a rank amateur when it comes to displaying your supps.
our an accountant from... like... Colombia! or... something
I think it's pretty normal, I usually only maintain eye contact with a stranger for 2-3 seconds at time unless I'm talking directly to them. Otherwise it feels awkward for me.
Ahh, so she'd rather have her SO ignore her while drinking and watching "the game" on TV then ;)
Congrats! I'm in the same situation.  I've been out of school for one year and I've only been working for about 6 months, part time, for around $400-500 a month. I just accepted a full time job working on video production/post production for a website I love, and I get to travel all over the country for the position.  Huzzah for the BFA finally paying off!
Yes, but it's coming off as just stupid. 
I'm not sure what we would have to piss and moan about this?
Only if you are wearing flared trousers and speaking in mid/late 1970s slang.
'04 G35 sedan
Hah, yeah I started young, but now he likes it so much if I actually want to vacuum anything besides the floor I have to lock him in the bathroom.
Okay, so they don't take it all off.
Yes, BUT restaurants expect a high turnover because they employ people who are transient and less than professional.   I doubt they would waste any of their time destroying your 'good' name in the media.  60 Minutes will not be knocking at your door to do any investigative journalism.  
I'm not even remotely a fan of Obama or his DOJ, but this impresses me. Time will tell if it's a legitimate crackdown or an empty political gesture. Either way, I haven't seen very many elected officials even addressing the issue of out-of-control police.
Isn't it FSU that takes a patch of turf from each team they beat on their home field?  That is a pretty nice one as well if you ask me.
I'd recommend reading the five short playwrights of [Sarah Kane](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sarah_Kane), those should be pretty interesting for students ^_^
I bought the equipment from sunelectric and hired the installer/engineer. The total cost $30k. My annual power bill was $1800, after the 30% tax credit the cost is 21K. In just under 12 years at present rates it will break even. These systems are designed to last at least 25 years.  
I'm not too good about magic characters, but if you follow Vehumet he'll garuntee you access to the Book of Power (eventually) which contains Iskenderun's Mystic Blast, essentially a beefier Magic Dart. IMB should take care of fire immune/highly-resistant enemies until you get Fire Storm, which is only 35% resistible.  As for distance, you really should melee some weaker enemies to try and build up Fighting skill and help remedy your fragility. However, you are so fragile that most things will destroy you in melee range faster than you can blink. Conjure Flame is very useful for holding things off in tight corridors, yes. Personally, I think getting in range for Sticky Flame is too risky with a Deep Elf. If you were going for a more Hybrid-y HEFE, then it would probably be worth it, but Deep Elves are just so damn fragile. Most things that are very fast aren't *too much* of a threat. Dogs (hounds, war dogs, jackals, etc) are pretty fast and hard hitting, but they don't have a ton of hp so you can blast them pretty easily. Imps... imps are a bitch, best to just lure them up one level, wait for them to blink, then proceed exploring as normal. Once you get Mystic Blast you can laugh them off, though. Later on, Orb Guardians are fast as fuck, but by then you can just Fire Storm their asses off. That's all the super fast monsters I can think of right now, but I'm probably missing a lot.  edit: spelling
This is probably the best advice here.  Assuming you have some trade, continue to expand your portfolio.  If you don't have a portfolio, then why aren't you making one?  If you don't have a trade, then you probably need to go learn something.  If anything, the willingness to go learn will look good to employers.
In the same rut, I graduated with a less than useful degree, IST. Now working on Cisco Certifications to pursue network administration but alas, no experience. Got my CCENT in 4 months I should have my CCNA...sigh. Been looking for anything, call center work, technical support, just to get in with a company, even that is proving impossible. Sigh.
Ahh she looks very young in one of those pictures. For some reason she looks much bigger in this picture.
This is silly. Karmawhoring is silly. I just wanted to post a silly picture. Also I'm a girl. 
That sounds super cute!!!
150 super caps so far.
I don't have any mobile device capable of browsing the Internet that doesn't have a full keyboard.  I doubt that is the reason why, but if it is, it's a terrible reason.
Cities on the East Coast are pretty old and developed around the turn of the last century. So our streets were designed for horse and buggies with cobblestones, etc.  On top of that, our weather fluctuates from hot to cold many times a year. This pretty much wrecks city roads.
I can tell you the most recent.  This was all after the bar so we were all past drunk. I had to use the bathroom and to get there walk past the two girls we came back with. I ended up spilling this girls drink ALL over her. My buddy points out I should help her clean it up then jokingly adds "with your mouth" (baller wingman). So I ended up sucking all the booze I spilt off of the girls chest. When ever I thought okay that's enough someone would point out "I think you missed some". Then her friend pointed out "I think there's some on her tongue" (baller wingwoman).  All in all I didn't get laid so this cant be even close to the best story on here but this is one I can remember.  TL;DR: Didn't get laid.
Keep playing. Most of the stuff I'm seeing just comes naturally with practice. Your opening is solid, but you could use some practice with tactics. With practice you'll be able to quickly identify and scan all the important pieces and positions. With practice you'll see the 3 best moves on each side, and from there start being able to look in the future. You're playing well, you'll just need to beef yourself up. 
5 upvotes--good enough for me!
I do and I believe in the free market. I give every place at least two tries. If it sucks the second time I never go back. But all the other places I frequent know my usual. I have pretty much stopped using corporate type establishments as much as possible because I really dislike the customer service I get most of the time. 
&gt; Maybe a part of being a decent person always means to be constantly sad, often hopeless and at awe because a person like that sees everything clearly in all its ugliness.  On this planet, that certainly seems to be the case, unfortunately.  I do think that there are some humans that are sufficiently developed to be able to see the troubles and yet be able to rise above them, but that ability certainly doesn't apply to everyone.  &gt; The most puzzling thing, though at least for me, is that once in a while (granted rarely) you encounter a nice and decent human being who tries with all his might to "live decently in an indecent world".  I would actually say that *most* of us actually try to do this very thing.  This planet is a very difficult one, however, and often pushes many with even very good intentions to do very negative and counterproductive things.  &gt; if this planet is what you say it is, how come they ended up here?  I would say it's because a personality isn't "all good" or "all bad".  Inside even the worst of us, there is some good, and inside even the best of us, there is some bad.  In other words, there are souls that, even though they may be here because of some previous indiscretion or level of ignorance, they are *still* trying to do what they can to "go toward the light" so to speak.  As such, even those souls that deserve to be prisoners here try to do what they can to be granted their parole - and oftentime that includes learning to act in a more intelligent, selfless, and loving manner like the actions of the activist in Brazil which you described above.  As well, there are said to be certain, very advanced souls that purposefully incarnate here in order to help educate others.  Often, due to the great level of ignorance here, these souls *do* indeed meet with what appear to be very horrendous and untimely deaths.  &gt; how can a human race produce such monsters and such almost saints simultaneously? How is it even possible?  I think the answer to that lies in first realizing that it is not the human race itself that is responsible for producing anything.  The human race is the *effect* - not the cause.  The cause - i.e. the reason - behind our existence here lies in the ability of forces much stronger and more knowledgeable than you or I.  *They* are the ones in charge of who and what does or does not manifest and incarnate on this planet, and the decisions they make result in a mixture of different levels of development here.  This planet can be seen as a K-12 grade school in the cosmic ghetto.  As such, you *will* indeed get a lot of uneducated cretins.  You *will* get a lot of violent know-nothings.  However - and as is definitely the case in even the worse inner city schools - along with the throng of future criminals, you will also find brilliant and prodigiously talented kids that rise above the negativity.  This planet seems no different in that regard.  &gt; If human race is vile, then it should be homogeneously vile  and perhaps it *is* homogeneously vile.  Homogeny, however, still admits a certain level of discrepancy.  Homogeny does not mean "completely" or "100%".  It means "overall".  I think the conditions on this planet can easily make a race "overall vile" - yes - but all I have to do is look in the mirror to know that, for as much ignorance and asshole and jerk and fuckwad is in me, there is also at least as much love and compassion there as well; and since I know I am no different than anyone else, I also know that the same applies to you and everyone (regardless of how we may see them otherwise).  &gt; the tiniest minority is decent and trying to resist/actively counteract evil, and the rest are true psychopaths that are unfortunately always in position of power. This is something I cannot wrap my mind around.  Taking nothing away from the human capacity for ignorance and evil, I shall say that I am not certain that every being in a position of power on this planet is in fact a human at all.
1: Boy do I love the South.  2: As a fellow composter, I can verify that these bags do not compost at all.  3: If you had posted [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3KT_89gi2Dk), I would agree on the Karma-whoring. But this post is purely informational.  4: Contrary to popular belief, Southerners are smart and witty.  5: [this. again.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3KT_89gi2Dk)
Oh yeah, Reddit never makes judge-y threads about how dumb it is to study English in college, where people trot out their various certs, drop-out stories, and make fun of people with any sort of school debt or education. And don't even get me started on the "Literature is impossible to interpret" threads I see around here about once every two weeks. 
Similar situation.  * Cant get a job because of no car * Cant get a car because of no money * Cant get money because of no job
&gt; I deem higher education to be a worthy cause  [deem it worthy with your own money, not your neighbors'](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PGMQZEIXBMs)  higher education has become a [big scam](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VpZtX32sKVE)
White lithium grease is completely superior to WD40.  One application solves the problem.  WD40 is easier to apply though.
What do you do with all those small sticks?
This has infuriated me so many times. Thank you for making this.
I was actually waiting for 499 999 to see if I could possibly be the   500 000th signer 
Not only that but we can order them over the Internet.
Really didnt need to be a million videos.  And I've heard Ralfy pronounce Auchentoshan and Caol Ila differently, is there a definitive version?
This man speaks the truth. Let us bestow upon him a portion of our wages so that he may spread his teachings far and wide.  downvoted to "hell" in 3... 2... 1...
Northern Michigan, storm lasted about an hour.
Pull one out of your ass.
I have nothing to fall back on. Born into a poor family. 
Maybe this hasn't crossed your mind yet but...  **.... we ALL started out where you are. NONE of us started out with any experience, by definition.**  You just have to find that first employer who will take a flyer on you in spite of you having no experience.  And guess what? You *will* find that employer. We *all* found that employer.   And after that, you won't have this problem of no experience again.  You're not in a 'rut'. You're just in the same boat we've *all* been in when we first hit the job market.
See if you can get a smoky 2008 pinot from latitude 39 or whatever it's called.
hmm my friend has been working at Jandakot too, they might know each other already.
You may want to google "bottom buddy"
Thats what these are as well, but the momma bird is so used to me sitting there that she doesnt seem to mind my company anymore
have you heard of volunteering? And there are tones of government programs people dont know about that will send you all over the place, give you training, and you dont ever have to pay much.
If you'd like to see more from that session, go [here](http://www.trevorchristensen.com/blog/2011/05/madi-james-utah-engagement-photography/).
Look at it this way:  You have the god given privilege to see Bobby Kotick die in your lifetime.
your wife's a rape victim?
What scares me is that she is much more polished these days. She's still vapid, but doesn't stumble like she used to.
Single-Player: Pikmin 1-2, Viewtiful Joe 1-2, Cubivore, Eternal Darkness, Super Mario Sunshine, Killer 7, Wind Waker, Metroid Prime 1-3, RE4 (Wii version is best though), Paper Mario: The Thousand-Year Door,   Multi-Player: Gotcha Force (Must play Single Player to unlock character for versus), Final Fantasy Crystal Chronicles (Get Four GBA links, it's worth it), The Legend of Zelda: Four Swords Adventures (Ditto), Mario Kart Double Dash, WarioWare, Inc.: Mega Party Game$!
not mine. I saw it somewhere else and xposted it here. on the internet, skepticism is usually justified
I'd be lying if I said that I thought if this idea by myself. Totally inspired by [Ray Kurzweil](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Age_of_Spiritual_Machines#2099)
christ, I work from HOME. and I STILL dislike having to work. HEAVILY dislike.
Well look at Arkansas. Breaking the stereotype.
And that worthless piece of shit magical heater in your living room.
how much better can this deal get ?shut up and take my money i say!
Do an AMA.
It's the technique to form the precipitate!
It's mathematical. Remember, a "dimension" is nothing more or less than a degree of freedom. The equations don't care if that degree of freedom is in position space or momentum space or in fact any abstract configuration space.
I've been moto only for about 9 months. It's fun until it rains cold, cold rain. Or its 90+ ºF outside and then lots of traffic.
Between THIS and the increased bow damage, this is the RPG I have been waiting for since I was a little kid...
18.
Yeeeaaah, same here.
can someone explain to me what's so wrong about this nice guy routine? it seems that seddit will help guys pick up girls and develop confidence, but when youre looking for an actual relationship it doesn't hurt to stay classy.  the only problem i can spot is that he's not really kino escalating. what else am i missing? fill me in, guys.
Huh? You just said hitting timing attacks are harder, but then you say z is harder to play?
Here is where the problem lies.  All these writings were compiled into one big book.  And then, all the writings excluded from the book and considered non-inspired, inaccurate, or just plain wrong because they were not included in the Cannon.  So the problem we as Christians face is two fold:  1. The average Christian has no knowledge of the Bible as a BOOK.  Forget the whole Word of God aspect and study it as a really old book and learn how it was put together, when stuff was added to it, when stuff was removed, etc.  If the average Christian did this and was well versed in the history of the Bible as a work of literature then they could deal with problem #2.  2. To the average atheist zealot (I like atheists.  Any people that are willing to do good in the world without the belief in some eternal reward are pretty good people.  However, zealots of any religion/lifestyle/hobby disgust me) who argues the only proof that Jesus existed is in ONE book, the average Christian is ill prepared to defend their belief.  The atheist zealot has probably not studied the Bible in any detail, and I don't expect him/her to.  But the Christian that hasn't studied the Bible as a book can't explain how different books of the Bible and written by different people at different times, some at the same time, others years apart from each other.
That was an oddball show, and that puppet always freaked me out.  EDIT: Check it out, you can pick it up on DVD  http://shop.abc.net.au/browse/product.asp?productid=769032&amp;SearchID=10509321&amp;SearchRefineID=17615017  Plenty of very vague memories just looking at the charactors on the cover! The skinny puppet guy in black reminds me of Edward scissorhands.
Most people can't do it. 
Mix n' match!
Nah, they will be there with riot police. Who are we kidding. They don't know how to act different.
You need to make yourself stand out from the pool of applicants *somehow*. Anything unique enough will do. edit: clarified type of pool
Why take your picture with a cardboard cutout?
Look at the bluff on Broadway just north of the hospital - that promontory has rails under it.   But yes, we ***require*** a subway. 
The kids or the clothes?
Are you sure about that?
Ding ding ding
Upvote for also cracking me up. It was a slow burn, but soon enough I was cackling in my living room. I'm sure that was more information than you required. 
Why not just go [quote](http://www.gocomics.com/nonsequitur) something?
You should look at some of the standard systems like Magic Bullets. It talks about how stories work with seduction and what they're for.  The point is not to tell cool stories about what you did or how cool you are. The point is to create DHVs, almost oblique references to your higher value, without boasting. You're not trying to be entertaining. Let me demonstrate with a couple of quick stories I did.  "hey check it out, did you walk down 1st street tonight? Someone spilled hundreds of pounds of pepperoni slices all over the sidewalk. I thought it was autumn leaves until I stepped on them. Someone must have screwed up a delivery to the pizza place."   True story (I have pics), interesting, but created no attraction and I got blown out quickly. Now compare to this one. I opened some girls looking in a shop window at a shoe store.  "Okay, you have to tell me, which ones are *the* shoes? Oh those are nice. Boots are always nice. If you want really great boots, check out Boutique D, just down the block. I know the owner, she's really cool. But their stuff is really expensive."  Total lie, I don't know the owner. But I associated myself with expensive designer shoes (chick crack) and demonstrated some fashion sense. Attraction was created.
that was horrifying.
someone needs to make a three sagan moon t-shirt.  ([reference](http://i.imgur.com/q3MPo.jpg))
We're still not entirely sure what it is...it could be completely unrelated to what we're all thinking.  That said, from a far I could see your boss believing that it's a fucking wrinkly old dick.
I really want to try Saphir hops, though they're mostly for aroma.  They have hints of tangerine, and I just think that sounds awesome enough to try a single hopped beer with them.
Another comment from Dr. Sagan along those lines:  &gt; *"I don't want to believe. I want to know."*
hahaha it was a good remix =P someone posted it on fb
Bah.  I have Laputa *and* Totoro on VHS  *and* they were both recorded off of Japanese TV.
Dogs talk all the time.  Haven't you seen those videos where they say "I wuv you"?  But wings generating lift in a vacuum?  Utterly ridiculous.
Except for the part where Vit C is destroyed by heat.  Thats why they add Vit C to juice, its destroyed in the processing.  So it has vit c, until you make it edible. Then it has none.
That is still nepotism.
[Jellies!!!](http://wordpress.limacityschools.org/schristine/files/2011/05/jelly-shoes.jpg)
by, "went flying," I meant, "OMG THERES A FUCKING TICK IN MY HAND AAAAAAAA" and I threw it.
Fucking brilliant
precisely. 
We've never seen The Doctor sick. Maybe regeneration energy can heal him without causing a complete regeneration. Regeneration is only necessary when the damage is too bad to heal without replacing the whole body. If that is the case, the replacement hand might have caused a complete regeneration if that body was not so fresh. That seems like a pretty big wound to repair. He has regenerated from less before, like when he fell off his stationary bike and turned into 7.
I think abortion should be avoided as much as possible.  Consciousness occurs very early in a fetus as far as I know.  But I'm pro-choice, because I've heard too much about botched abortion attempts by nonprofessionals.  One death alone is more than enough for me.  The problem is better addressed by preventative measures, including relaxing constraints on surgical sterility options and firmly placing the responsibility of the decision appropriately on the recipient of the procedure.
Thanks for that. I was making a joke. 
Apple is like any other company There is no need to hate or make fun of people just because they use a specific smartphone, tablet or computer.
Frida Kahlo's work is emotional and provoking if you know anything about her life. Gain context, understand artwork. Go back to 4chan ignorant troll.
I was thinking more specifically of intensively farmed pigs which are routinely (and legally) tortured for their entire lives.
I just wanted to point out that skateboarders aren't all that retarded. Granted I know a few, but most of the skateboarders I know are nerds as well and not douches. Anyway, upvote for you good sir!
She is quite ugly if you ask me.
Yes I have listened to music. If I am to believe in a soul though, I require a bit more evidence than "how do you explain emotion" (the answer to that lies in our brain, not some made up soul). If the soul does exist as like some people believe, as in its not a physical thing, how exactly do drugs affect it?
Eu, que, na última vez que este tema foi aqui discutido no r/portugal apresentei as minhas ideias a favor do voto em branco, quero agora, através deste post admitir o meu erro estratégico.   A mudança precisa-se imediatamente!   Força Portugueses, vamos mostrar aos políticos e ao mundo, a vitalidade da nossa democracia, e a sagacidade do nosso povo!
Just bought a box of PG Tips a few weeks ago for the first time.  That shit is GOOD...ole chap wot wot.
"where eagles dare" by the misfits says "god" a whole lot, and i love that song.   of course it's "i aint no goddamn sonofabitch", but they still say god!
You should look for a 1,000GBP haggis. 
Definitely not.
Working hard in A-levels are definitely well worth it. They can determine what university you're accepted to which means they determine the next four years of your life! I mucked around with my AS-levels, and had to get my act together for final exams!   Cambridge is always a possibility! Although the work amount there is just another level. They have breaks every 6 weeks because people begin burning out. My friends boyfriend is at Cambridge, doing economics. He's in his third year, doing his final exams at the moment. The four exams he's doing now basically constitute the entirety of his degree. All exams up until now haven't counted. It's insane.   Edinburgh is supposed to be gorgeous though :)  I am at the University of Bath, yes. I am doing an undergraduate masters in Molecular and Cellular biology :) It's an accelerated course, so I come out with a Masters degree, rather than a BSc. Four years with one year as an industrial placement (which I'm doing in a lab in the University of Western Australia, Perth, working in neuroscience). 
But there's no cancel link. :( The email says there's suppose to be one?  Nor is there a place I can cancel on the order page.
Your own damn Vault?
the school i am in now is really small and we are about 20 people in my year and the girls there are either married or not pretty at all :(.
Don't go on a fucking tour.  Drive your car.
ebay, craigslist, friends who no longer play yugioh...  The problem with Ebay is that people will either overprice you for amazing cards being in a crappy deck, or overprice you because all the cards are together in a set.  Craigslist, I haven't checked, but it's worth a shot.  Friends, well yeah.  Batterymen are a rather old theme, which are hard to come by.  Either try to find a store that sells old cards, or you'll be forced to buy them individually.  They're rather pricey for commons (batteryman AA= $2).
DAMN, animas ping &gt; anything
I liked everything but the last sentence, too peachy
A person in a relationship where there is psychological abuse, which this situation borders on, and manipulation, which this situation definitely is, will stay in a relationship because they don't think that they can do any better and that they need their abusive/manipulative partner in order to survive. Being called ugly is a tactic used by the abuser/manipulator to break down the self-esteem of the other person to put them in a position where they will not leave.
How in the world did you find that? O.O
Remember only eleven years ago when doing something like that brought down Massachusetts Acting Governor Jane Swift? Na. Nobody remembers.   http://tech.mit.edu/V119/N67/col67ring.67c.html  And now it's just business as usual.  
That's an issue with some of the SIG556R's (7.62x39mm) and not the SIG556's (5.56x45mm)
"i'll be back"
I swear it is from an Australian movie called "Animal Kingdom," but I can't find clips long enough from the movie to prove it. If you can find out, I'ld love to know.
We're all one dude.
Howabout we just implement Evenprime's ConvenientInventory and get the whole thing done with?
Damn. Better tell Israel they missed about a fifth of their own population when they were trying to cleanse the Arabs. That was silly of them, wasn't it?
&gt;Also the CBO has updated their numbers to 2007. Now why is that important? The Bush tax cuts are in the more current years. [http://cboblog.cbo.gov/?p=226](http://cboblog.cbo.gov/?p=226).  Good - now you see the taxes are progressive, with the rich carrying most of the tax base by total and by percentage. What tax rates would satisfy you? It seems you want to tax the rich more, even though they pay quite a bit. What amount is enough? The Bush tax cuts lowered everyones taxes. I agree we should undo them, and raise *everyone's* taxes.  &gt;I personally think we should have a corporate tax but I understand your point. The reason I think we need one is to modify corporate behavior.  We do have corporate taxes. They are given tax incentives to incentivize behavior, just like personal income taxes. There are also laws regulating behavior of both corporations and individuals. I don't understand your comment.  &gt;Having a few families with most of the money.  If you read the Congressional link I posted above you'll see estate taxes were instituted to finance wars, not to stop the rich. You'll also see empirical evidence that even though many people claim it is now used to stop the rich, it has little effect for that. Among the many studies on this claim comes the quote **"only about 2 percent of inequality was attributable to the unequal distribution of inherited wealth"**. Read the article, especially the part about inheritance taxes in practice. They do not do what you want them to do.  &gt;Again 5% of the population in the US holds 65% of all the wealth.  Do you think they took wealth that is somehow rightfully yours? If a doctor works hard and earns multiples of what the average person earns, did he take from the people? If an entrepeneur starts a business and it grows and he is wealthy, do I have a right to tell him to give me some? The reason few hold so much is only a few have the brains, work ethic, persistence, and drive to make new businesses. Of the 5% you mention (15 million people) how many do you think are doctors, lawyers, or own their own self-started business? They got rich because people paid them for things the people wanted. Now you claim the people should take the money back?  Since you ignored this last time, I repeat: show me how the lower groups ever catch up in total taxes by $ amount or by rate. If you cannot then you have to admit the rich pay more in taxes than any other group by both percentage and by total. If the rich already pay a disproportionate amount of taxes, and you want to raise their taxes, how much is enough? How do you know what the right rate is?
Yep.
Striking!
So you're taking drugs for no good reason. Dude, seek help.
i think it's fun and it fits my playstyle
* Aerofoil – Vortex * Klauss Goulart – Turbulence * Mario Hammer - Life Before the Earthquake * Grube &amp; Hovsepian - Invisible * Skytech – Sirens
I'm certainly planning on it. Why not? Finally found a source of high powered blotter acid, from Switzerland, no less. It would be a shame to let that go to waste, wouldn't it?  &gt;We had two bags of grass, seventy-five pellets of mescaline, five sheets of high powered blotter acid, a salt shaker half full of cocaine, and a whole galaxy of multi-colored uppers, downers, screamers, laughers... and also a quart of tequila, a quart of rum, a case of beer, a pint of raw ether and two dozen amyls. Not that we needed all this for the trip, but once you get locked in a serious drug collection, the tendency is to push it as far as you can. --HST
Good god. Glad you made it out ok.   Did you then walk right across the street and say you had a trade-in?
Roadrunner.  Great mag about motorcycle touring.  Very high quality publication.  
You're in luck my friend.  Monster Hunter Freedom 3 HD (PS3 remake/port with updated graphics etc.) was unveiled about a week ago.  Looks like the PSP version has been out since December in Japan so hopefully that'll get over here soon, and hopefully the HD remake comes over even sooner!  Luckily, if you have a Wii, there's MH Tri to hold you over for a while till such a time comes.
I wouldn't go, mainly because I wouldn't want to risk getting snookered into purchasing a timeshare.  That being said, I'd do some research on the company that's holding the presentation and find out what people have to say about them.
Fuck no, keyboarding requires more accuracy and precision than the monkey task of mouse pointery. Use this opportunity to laugh at the puny righties as they use their dominant hand to do a monkey task!
It's good, but I prefer Fred Savage to be working on It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia instead.
YES! THANK YOU! SO MUCH BETTER. Seriously, if you'd made that your original post, I'd be willing to bet money that you'd have triple the upvotes and comments. These pictures make me want to drive over to my parents' place and drag my 6yr old brother out of bed to play legos with me.
Last time I looked at the VES website where this originates from it wasn't there, in february I think. It popped up on cgtalk so I thought I'd submit it to reddit
I'll drink to that!
He didn't take offense to the homo part, he thought it was stupid that the kid thought that Arbiter = Halo.
lol L4D2. The last time I played that game high I just got lost in the woods and eventually killed. gdi.
I have an MS in Information Science. There are a lot of papers on these topics.
If you're going to do something like this at least post the other WC final dive that got Heitinga sent off.
You don't see the difference? The logical difference?
My first job out of college was a 3-month internship at $12/hour.  I still work at the same place, and make much, much more than that.
That's dangerously sober.
its a bong. a small one. fill it up with a lil water. pack a fat bowL. hit that shit. name it (eventually/creatively). get to know it. APPRECIATE IT.
Downvote for use of the word whatnot
Show me this Q :-p
I'd like to see some of the people with this type of attitude actually try to find a job. It's harder than you think. The jobs that are open get taken before you even have time to blink twice, and a lot of the jobs that are still open require experience, either in the field or just in general.    It has nothing to do with age. The economy is shit right now, and just because some people are floundering in it doesn't make them a moron, nor does it mean that they aren't trying their asses off.
Hmm, I suddenly have an odd craving for Denny's. 
But who the fuck WAS Mohammed?  If their existence is in question, it's a valid question. 
Easy to the point of boredom != simplicity
Netflix needs to be designed in a similar way to IMDB/ESPN.com.  I want to be able to click on any part of the movie and find similar available instant queue movies.  I like this director, actor, year, etc....
SO MUCH THIS.  Seriously, why can't I have an android phone with the form factor of my old Blackberry Bold 9000? Half the device was a huge, comfortable keyboard - and when you spend the vast majority of your time on your phone TYPING, this is what you want. I don't want to have to flip the keyboard out, I want it RIGHT THERE, as the primary interface.  And not some half-assed thing like the Droid Pro either.  The only thing that the Blackberry has going for it is the physical UI.  Make a phone that duplicates that exactly and RIM is dead and buried.
Bailiff! Whack his pee-pee! 
What fucking tangent did she just go off on? I blink and she is talking about CGI popstars.
I think genetics are screwed up... How in earth that euphemism could conceive such a beautiful girl?
I am not very good in the kitchen. If I mess one thing up it's down hill from there...
Steam overlay? I'm not entirely sure you're gonna get a chance to go use these tips anytime soon.
Yeah, 'cause that worked out so well for the Native Americans.
Volunteer.
Single issue voters, FTW!!!!
Who the fuck tries to break into a house wearing a neon yellow shirt?
Don't give up. Keep trying. I am finally starting work Monday related to my schooling after a 1.3 years of graduation, and 0.6 year of no work (not even odd-jobs).  Don't give up. Its madness to try the same thing expecting different results, but keep applying and trying your best at interviews. Also do unpaid work unless you're prohibited from your field related professional body.
AmeriCorps or other service opportunities.
**WHAT?**
Ha, thanks for pointing that out. Fixed now. 
Fuck you guys and your scorpion mounts.  Whoever decided a lion was an adequate equivalent should be fired.
That's a proactive solution to shedding.
Rockford IEMS with my phone
This doesn't really solve the use case, though.   var x = 1    def foo():   var x = x + 1  This should still raise a NameError unless you change the underlying way variables are handled in Python; and then you don't need fancy syntax.
Acquisition and application of knowledge for humanity's betterment.
Oh man. I hate dutch. Granted, I was only there intermittently between fishing trips. You been there before?
Easter Seals is legit, though they are a bit churchy. They helped my parents teach me to walk when I was a little girl in leg braces, and gave me the opportunity to meet other disabled kids (though with physical therapy, I no longer need assistance of any kind) and those with developmental issues as well, and it was a great experience, even though I was a small child.   I felt like, even though I was different (didn't know I was a little lez *quite* yet) these kids liked me for who I was. I don't think they have an overt agenda, or would really care, but then again, I was a cisgendered prepubescent girl, so your mileage may vary. I don't remember a ton of overt religious stuff.
I wonder how well those kids do at things like entrepreneurship though? I have no doubt they make great workers, just there may be better ways of raising ones children to give them talents in other areas.  I wonder how successful those children are at picking up women in life?
&gt;I don't care about your definition of value, I'm talking about actual value  No, let's be clear here since you seem to be terrible at mathematics.  You are talking about 'perceived' value, i'm am talking about absolute value.  You are overpaying for your rat shelter.  Deal with it or do not, that's not my problem.  For the record, i'm a married, old and a father.  I mention cute chicks in the building just for your sake since you seem single.  Let's face it, not many chicks will call your place 'cool'.  TL;DR  Stop bragging about your tiny pos apartment.  You look like a fool.
Just curious, what size do you wear?  I know these are kind of a one size fits all sock.  I typically wear a size 12 US and these don't show at all for me.  A smaller foot might show more sock though.
Careful, the (expanded) PS3 version of vesperia will probably be released within a year or so.  What kind of PS2 do you have?
Very cute!  You can save $$$$$$ in furniture by spending $ on a toy.
To answer your question I used to do 30 laps or 750m in 20 mins....  However I can't complain enough about the lack of reasonably priced pools available for lap swimming at semi-normal hours.
Exercise. Melatonin. Vitamins. Proper diet.  Maybe magnesium,  it is supposed to help with restlessness.  That's what I've been doing....
Isn't it a relief though? Now that you have been caught, you don't have to worry about being caught. You silly child molester you.
It is not considered unconstitutionally bad tasting.  Your wikipdeia article only says that denying prisoners food as punishment is unconstitutional. Please fix your title as it is misleading.
...and being unemployed is better?   I've read through a number of responses that reek of either entitlement or a defeatist attitude.  I'm only 30 so this isn't jaded old man advice either.  Doesn't matter if you went to Stanford and have a 3.9GPA, doesn't matter if you did all the extra-circulars and internships your mom said would look good on your resume, etc.  End of the day you make yourself and that's it.  Like I said, my CEO worked for free because he knew what he wanted and he went and got that shit.  And now he runs a global shop.  I slaved away on my site on nights and weekends sinking hundreds of unpaid hours before it made a dime, and kept at it for years before it started to make some real money. See the pattern there?  The degrees, schools we went to, bitching about our rent, etc wasn't a factor.  People can downvote what they don't want to hear, but it doesn't make it untrue.
They're amazing aircraft, don't get me wrong- it was a bit of a difference seeing the Blackbird land compared to the Hog. I'm pretty sure a kite could beat an A-10 in a race.  Of course that kite would never live to tell the tale...
Oh, I didn't realize that....  &gt;you must have never been to the deep south or the inner city in NY or Los Angeles.  ....meant afghanistan. My geography classes weren't great though.
By "two years old" I thought you meant it was taken two years ago at first. Made me think you were only about four years old before clicking your slightly more recent picture.
It is childsplay to create a god which can exist. The problem is that either these gods are irrelevant or no one acknowledges such a being as a god. The tri-omni god, is what people typically refer to a god, and this god is positively ruled out.
I remember that one time when the peace corps stopped a massacre...  nope.   The peace corps are an amazing group of very dedicated individuals that greatly help many desperate people, but they don't stop evil men from doing evil things.
Dragon Quest VIII + Okami for Killzone 2? Yeah, I'd be willing to do that.
TMNT was the most anger-inducing game ever made...
Well, I suppose this is sleazy, but for our anniversary, my boyfriend and I went to a strip club and got some action with a very nice dancer in the VIP room. That was all the lady action I needed. She seemed to enjoy herself (strippers love when couples come in, especially ladies) and it was great because there were no strings attached and no hurt feelings. Just lust.
Well I will be using tcp/ip or udp. Im not sure about the local pipe stuff. Just basic networking. My question is that if I use my server in my single player game using the same machine  there are various ways to handle that. The simplest way is the just use a network loop through local host. This does use the OS networking stack and shouldnt be an issue. Then there is the more direct approach of have interprocess communication or just supplying the client and server in the one process and allowing them to reference each other. Doing anything except the localhost would require me to use a proxy class to handle whether I am playing MP or SP. This adds more effort.   So my question was mostly me being curious about how quake and Half Life handle it. Do they simple utilize localhost (127.0.0.1) and do networking as normal or do they do some form of interprocess communication tricks?
7 days of stalking. nope, not pathetic at all
|Temperature islands usually have better weather during the summer  Thanks!
I agree with the one about asking questions during DVDs. My sister did it yesterday, in the very first scene of a movie none of us had seen before. How the fuck are we meant to know?  Also, doors creaking. It makes me so angry.
Upvoted for the TL;DR :).
Last I checked, PHP is still the most used language by far.  Edit: And to clarify, I'm talking about this in the context it was being discussed (web programming).  PHP is obviously not the most used language overall.
Hoo boy, you wouldn't believe.
Yea I hear ya. I'm hoping this doesn't turn out to be TWO weekends where I fail at getting tickets now. BUT, to bring up an interesting bit, think they will sell 2-weekend packages? Maybe it will be cheaper to get a 2-weekend package and split it with someone? There potential to be frugal here... as frugal as you can be with Coachella tickets at least.
This is the part where you speak up, dude. It sucks that it was done to you, but you let it be done to you. Me? I was raised that if you pull some bullshit like that with weed on purpose, I'm grabbing said joint/blunt and putting it out on you. You'll remember every time you try and fuck someone over like that again. I've met far too many smokers who take advantage of other smoker's generosity. I've been called by "friends" to smoke and then they proceed to ask me if *I* have any weed. 
In college it was, "I fucked your mother" but now it's the much less profane "The.Seaward".
Hopefully I can do the same thing as long as my scholarship can cover most of my books. 
Omg has anybody told you you have really pretty hair very sexy.Don't get me wrong nice ass and tits to but your hair is what  sets it off.ps i love the ink to.
Oh well, the worst person to obbey is possibly yourself ;)
Idk, playing Helen Keller in the regular version on the Touchy-Feely category is the best play I've ever witnessed.
Yeah, nice try *PIRATE!*
When I first started playing SC, I watched my friend play as zerg and unleash the filthiest of all mutalisk harass. This kind of hooked me on to the zerg playstyle...plus the worst part about playing Terran or Protoss is being on the other end of this harass.
Alright, this has been my specialty for a few years now. I think this genre (the post-rock-neoclassical) was pioneered initially by the band [Rachel's](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rachel%27s). All of their albums are very very good. Next, a list of artists that I would recommend ALL of their work:  1. Library Tapes  2. Goldmund  3. Max Richter  4. Ludovico Einaudi (more on the classical side)  5. Eluvium  6. David Darling  7. Amiina  8. Yann Tiersen (this guy tops all of them)
sounds about right... (piggyback riding theories beyond my understanding)
Did he...poke her face?
So as far as TV series goes... Survivors by the BBC was good.  And there was that one that was set in Kansas... I forget what it was called, but I enjoyed it.
I was going to say Nicki Minaj on Monster, but Kanye's verse is just so underrated. Its just like Jay Z's Verse getting overshadowed by Eminem. Before you all downvote I am not saying Nicki is on Eminem's level
kill it with fire
Ill communicate your skull into some engineering
I rolled out of the box and got penalty points during my exam. Oops.
Peacing. lol.
The Cantillons are the only reason I'd go back.  But seriously, Moeder Lambic Fontainas has 5 Cantillons ON DRAFT!!!  Which is impossible to get here in Atlanta.  They also usually pour a special Cantillon brewed just for that bar!  If you love Cantillon then you have to go there.
Okay, well, my number's a South Carolina number, so we'll need to cover for that. Maybe I, Aaron Burr, am a former employer that has since moved to SC?
Oh man, dude, you're totally right. I've misjudged her completely! Thank you for pointing out my idiocy. You are truly a beacon of light and justice on the internet.
Or as I see it, more clevage..
whatever you say ;)
Sounds like he needs to prestige.
I dunno. It's looks half-hearted to me.
Thanks for the comment. Going to do the giveaway tomorrow afternoon. I'll send you a link to the post. Several Sexxitors will win prizes galore. Bring on the orgasms! 
I often hear this criticism of libertarianism in one form or another and I have to ask: why does opposition to the *means* by which those goods and services are delivered somehow imply opposition to use of the goods themselves?
14: sex
Meh, I don't mind someone actually vetting code and not letting companies steal information off my phone.  
